The big return of the Czech disaster is approaching.
Pavel Francouz has been called up to the NHL
Czech ice hockey goaltender Pavel Francouz, who is going through a difficult period of his career in recent months, is returning to the NHL.
The 31-year-old Plzeň native will be on the bench and could soon be in the goal.
The former goaltender for Litvínov, Pilsen and the Russian Chelyabinsk was injured in preparation for the NHL in October this year.
He was replaced at exactly the halfway point of the game against Vegas and has not appeared on an NHL ice sheet since.
The incident happened as the experienced goalkeeper moved from one post to the other.
"Pavel Francouz will be out for approximately three to four weeks with a lower-body injury," the team announced in early October.
His return to the NHL crease eventually stretched to more than two months.
He was called up from the farm on Sunday morning American time, where he caught four duels and showed his old form.
In the AHL, he posted a 94.5% save percentage.
The Pilsen-born hockey player wants to finally break through and confirm that he belongs in the best league in the world.
He had hip problems last year and didn't play a single game in the shortened pandemic season.
In the NHL, "Francík" played 36 games, with a success rate of 92.3%.
Charles' Christmas card features Camilla's face mask, William and Kate pose in Jordan
Britain's Prince William and his wife Kate have chosen a family photograph taken during a visit to Jordan as their Christmas card this year.
Prince Charles also published his wish, using a photograph in which he helped his wife, Camilla, put on a mask at the races.
The British Broadcasting Corporation (BBC) reported this on its website.
The wishes are sent to friends, co-workers and charities they work with.
The photo was taken somewhere in the desert.
The Duchess of Cambridge is dressed in a long khaki summer dress, and so is Princess Charlotte.
Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge, is wearing shorts and a shirt with a collar, just like Princes George and Louis.
It is not clear who took the photograph or when it was taken.
Last year the royal family posed for their Christmas card photo in a pile of straw in front of a stack of logs at their country home in Norfolk.
The heir to the throne, Prince Charles, and his wife Camilla also released a picture to serve as a Christmas card.
Photographer Sam Hussein captured him at the races in Ascot in June.
Charles, who is wearing a cap and a mask on his face, helps Camille put on her mask to match her light-coloured dress.
According to efotbal.cz, Slavia promised Berbr a million for the title, which Tvrdík denied.
Prague - The investigators in the current corruption case are allegedly working on the assumption that the accused former deputy chairman of the Czech Football Association, Roman Berbr, was promised one million Czech crowns by the Prague Slavia for the league title in the 2018/19 season.
The website efotbal.cz informed about it and said that it had access to part of the police files.
The chairman of the board of the Vršovice club, Jaroslav Tvrdík, said that the white-and-reds did not engage in any corrupt behaviour.
The website published transcripts of police wiretaps, in which Slavia is mainly represented by its former sporting director, Jan Nezmar, who left the club last summer.
According to the indictment, the former influential official of the red-and-whites was in frequent contact with Berbra and with the former sports director of the then second-division club Vyšehrad, Roman Rogoz, who is also among the accused in the case.
The police were reportedly working with information that Slavia had promised Berbatov a financial reward for winning the title.
In 2019, SK Slavia Prague won the first league title.
The police authority was aware that Roman (Berbr) had been promised a million-dollar bribe by the officials of SK Slavia Prague for winning the league, the server quoted from the file.
The following day, according to the investigators, Berbr met not only with Nezmar, but also with the chairman of the board of directors of Slavia, Tvrdík.
According to the website, it is no longer clear from the file whether the police are still dealing with this information.
Tvrdík denied any corrupt dealings.
Between 2015 and 2017, we actively tried to change the situation in Czech football and offered an alternative to its development.
We have never committed any illegal acts, we have never tried to influence referees against the rules of fair play, and we have never provided anyone with any financial benefits in this regard," said Tvrdík for Seznam Zprávy.
In the recordings, Nezmar, among other things, indiscriminately insults some former dark-skinned Slavia players and also defames his former boss, Tvrdík.
The case of alleged match-fixing through referees was sparked by a police raid in the middle of October last year at several locations, including the FAČR headquarters in Prague.
The highest-ranking official in the scandal is Berbr, who is no longer involved in any football functions.
In mid-January, he was released from custody, just like the former Vyšehrad sports director Rogoz.
Helicopters, tanks and bvp are cold war larping.
The new tanks will be of a worse type (the gunners will have to leave the armoured cabin and carry the ammunition by hand without protection).
The cars - Toyota Hilux - are new and good
Trucks and various armored vehicles - at a decent level, moreover, it has already been possible to get rid of the Praga V3S even in specialist units.
Airplanes: combat - decent, but at the end of their rental, transport - too small with a short range, but modern.
Drones - few and only small types with no combat potential
Missiles - we don't have any (but we produce them and export them abroad)
NGO: mid-Cold War, obsolete; short-range - good, modern, relatively good numbers.
I've got a story.
I have a hunting lodge right next to the city.
Nutria were climbing out of the river and doing damage to the crops, so I sat there.
When I came, I saw that there was a fisherman on the other side of the river.
I didn't want to make a scene, so I just sat down and the guy probably didn't notice me.
I was hoping she would leave before anything came out, but of course a little while later, the fox came.
I let her get to 40 meters before I decided to shoot.
The poor fisherman nearly soiled himself, he was waving his cap all over the place, so I called out to him that it was the fox.
Before I came off the bench, I was livid.
In other words, it is possible for a man to be a pussy.
On the other hand, it isn't war, it would have to be a series of coincidences for something to happen. You'd probably be seen on a thermal camera, which everyone has these days.
So in a visible place, expensive things to put at your feet in your sleeping bag and you should be fine.
Vojtěch versus Hamáček.
The Ministry of Interior obtained respirators at a significantly lower price than the Ministry of Health
The state, responsible for the purchase and distribution of face masks, masks and respirators to the professions closest to the coronavirus, has spent billions of crowns in recent weeks on their procurement.
The iRozhlas server compared the purchases of individual ministries and found that during a single day the amounts for respirators differed by hundreds of crowns.
Why did the prices fluctuate so dramatically?
Which authorities have been frugal?
And why were others buying more expensive ones?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks to iRozhlas editor Dominika Kubištová.
I respect soldiers and the army (perhaps I am not affected by memories of the Czechoslovak People's Army, which the older generation went through), but the Czech Republic cannot benefit from compulsory military service.
We don't even have large stores of equipment that could be grabbed by the trained, we don't even have modern equipment for the current professionals, plus modern equipment is always more complex, so the abilities of the reserves will be rapidly lost over time.
On top of that, modern conventional conflicts, where anyone can get involved, will play out very quickly, and there won't be time to retrain people.
And finally, the reserves/territorial defence are of great importance for countries such as Ukraine, where it is necessary to wage mass guerrilla warfare and it is also a stated necessity to deter the enemy.
In the Czech Republic, it will only be possible to fight a war of such scale and intensity that guerrilla warfare will be irrelevant, and we do not have the right geography for that.
Mainly, we don't have individual skills.
And that's not even the worst of it.
The worst thing is that half of them play like they have one.
Then you find yourself in situations where you're watching a guy who missed an open net 2 minutes ago, driving into a 2-on-2 or even a 3-on-2, and you say to yourself, "What the hell does he think is going to happen now?"
Of course, they will treat him like an average taxpayer.
The situation with this skill of "beating a defender" is so terrible that I caught myself being genuinely surprised when I saw that our attacker managed to outrun one of the opponent's players.
The first signs
The COVID-19 pandemic is slowing down, but experts do not expect a major turnaround in the coming weeks.
According to statistical models, the pressure on hospitals will remain for some time, and a new unknown has been added to the pandemic equation: the omicron variant, which is very likely to spread faster than the currently predominant Delta.
At the same time, it is not yet possible to say with absolute certainty whether it can cause a more serious course, how much it is helped by vaccination or post-infectious immunity acquired by a previous illness.
This week, however, an unexpected phenomenon has entered the Covid equation on the plus side: the possibility of treatment.
A new drug, the antiviral molnupiravir, has arrived in the Czech Republic, which reduces the risk of severe illness and hospitalisation by a third and can be taken at home.
It will soon be joined by Pfizer's paxlovid drug, which reports a success rate of 85 per cent.
The first deliveries of molnupiravir to the Czech Republic have not only raised hopes of expanding the portfolio of tools useful in the fight against the coronavirus pandemic, but have also highlighted the question of how the Czech administration is prepared for the arrival of new drugs.
As mentioned, the first one to reach Czech patients will be Merck's molnupiravir.
The company ended up at the front of the line in part because the drug was already in development long before the current pandemic to find a treatment for a viral disease in horses on the South American continent.
What is often overlooked in this research is that people in the West (Germany, Sweden, etc.)
are generally less open and do not share their views so openly.
On the other hand, Eastern Europeans, and especially we Czechs, are used to saying "as if a beak grew on our nose".
So you do research where you ask people if they like Muslims.
In the Czech Republic, most people will tell you straight up that they don't.
In the West, they'll tell you how much they love migration, how everyone should help them, and how we Czechs are racist scumbags.
And then they go and vote for a party like the AfD.
They fear cancel culture - saying this in public means losing your job and being mobbed by the media.
Then it looks nice in the polls, west good, east bad.
But it really finds out what people think.
In France, Le Pen and Zemmour both have over 20%, according to polls.
We even know that there are three of them and that they are completely identical.
Identical due to the rotation of the units so that the soldiers don't have to relearn where everything is, all the buildings are almost exactly the same.
One is the Atom Museum Brdy and the other two are abandoned.
The funny thing is that the USSR did not want to have nuclear warheads on its own territory, either for security reasons or because of the speed of deploying warheads due to its western location.
Only the warheads were stored in the underground shelters (there are two in each maple tree) and not the entire missiles as is said.
If it was necessary to deploy this weapon, a special unit would have been called in to pick up the warhead and mount it on some kind of delivery system.
In addition to the museum maple, the rest are in a dilapidated state.
In elementary school, we had a Gypsy classmate for 4 years.
He was pretty good, he made some good jokes, he was often too talkative, but he was like our mascot.
Everyone was talking to him, he often came back and wanted to explain something, he was almost always here, he engaged in sport with us, he didn't steal snacks or mobile phones, he came dressed properly.
He went to nature schools, did all sorts of monkey business, but he was fine, he never got into any trouble.
In eighth or ninth grade, the siblings, the Roma, entered the same year, different classes.
Shortly afterwards, the teacher was beaten up, the police were often there, they were threatening and intimidating other students...
I sometimes sell things on classifieds (old stuff, things I don't need, etc.) and I've sold to Gypsies many times. They always had money, they didn't try to get me to lower the price, and the communication was calm.
I even sold a car this way, a guy called me a month later and said that he had already transferred it to himself...
I say myself that I'm not a racist, I don't care if someone is white, black, yellow, blue or other, as long as he behaves as he should in a decent society (works, functions, doesn't beat women, just normal behaviour).
But as soon as someone comes, they stretch out their hand, they move out of the apartments and houses, there's just a mess around them, they cause problems... it doesn't matter what colour they are, but it will bother me.
I have no problem with African migrants, if they get involved here, start a business, work, learn the language (not necessarily, at least English), and respect our culture.
I don't care if they believe in Allah, as long as they respect my traditions and culture, I will respect theirs too.
A young woman died in a car crash in Prachatice
"The young woman suffered serious multiple injuries and despite resuscitation efforts, sadly succumbed to her injuries at the scene," said Zuzana Fajtlová, a spokeswoman for the South Bohemian ambulance service.
The accident was probably caused by the driver who was taking the girl.
The 18-year-old driver of the Peugeot was probably driving from the village of Žíchovec to the village of Bavorov, and for unknown reasons, he left the road in a bend.
The Peugeot ended up on its roof off the road after the collision with the Skoda Octavia, described the accident by the spokesperson for the South Bohemian police, Štěpánka Schwarzová.
The young driver of the Peugeot was seriously injured in the accident.
He sustained multiple injuries and was trapped in the vehicle.
After his release, he had to be provided with emergency pre-hospital care, and, in a stable condition, he was airlifted to a hospital in České Budějovice, paramedic Fajtlová stated.
She added that the man in the second car suffered minor chest injuries and was taken to hospital.
New rules apply to parcels from non-EU countries, customers often do not provide information about them
Lukáš Neuheisl orders from abroad several times a month.
He mainly collects collector's cards.
"Usually, it can be tens of dollars, say from ten dollars up, where it is still worthwhile to import, especially from Japan, where postage is often free," says the collector.
Since October, ordering small parcels has become slightly more expensive, as he now has to add VAT, and the postal service has to submit data for customs proceedings.
He gets an email saying customs is awaiting the arrival of the package.
Then, all you have to do is fill in the information about the parcel, and if the seller did not include VAT in the sale, the customs authority will collect it from the total amount for the parcel and delivery.
In the case that the recipient does not take care of the customs procedure themselves, the total amount must also include the payment to the carrier.
According to Lukáš Neuheisel, however, the whole process is not complicated.
I tick one or two boxes, add two attachments and I'm done.
For me, it is usually a matter of five minutes, says Neuheisl.
Not all deliveries go smoothly, however.
As a result of the new customs regulations, the daily number of parcels received from abroad at the international post office in Prague has fallen from 60,000 to 15,000.
According to the Czech Post Office, the problem is also that people do not respond to requests for information needed to complete customs procedures.
There are currently 30,000 parcels waiting to be processed at the international post office.
If people filled in all the information that is required, and filled it in on time, we would be about halfway there, says Czech Post spokesman Matyáš Vitík.
Inflation resolution
See the title, how would you propose to deal with the current inflation?
Inflation is currently at 9.9% and is expected to rise further.
What do you think should be done to slow down or compensate for this growth?
We see, for example, in Poland, a reduction in VAT on food and PHM, is this the way forward for you?
What do you think is going to happen that is inevitable with where it's going?
Prices are rising faster than wages, it is inevitable that people will not be able to afford ordinary things, especially energy.
How much did you get added (if you are an employee)?
I've been given a 2% pay rise this year, which is a joke, but luckily I have a similar income from a business that I run alongside my job.
Would someone be able to explain to me why convicted violent offenders are sent to prison for only 6 months?
I just can't get my head around how a court can put such a beast behind bars for only 6 months, just to do it again as soon as they get out.
6 months is nothing compared to the fact that his/her victim will have trauma for years, negatively affecting her sexual relationships and relationships in general.
Not to mention the fact that rape victims don't have to get over it, either.
Will this deter potential future rape victims from coming forward?
A man from Hrob "shot" his girlfriend from Kostomlat
The man from Hrob accidentally helped the officers to secure his countrywide wanted girlfriend from Kostomlat, who was wanted on an arrest warrant.
He called her himself.
He went about it in a roundabout way, however.
He first approached a passerby and made up a story that he had been robbed.
Officers responding to the 911 call arrived on the scene and couldn't believe their eyes when the alleged "victim" told them he made the whole thing up to get the officers to come to the scene.
In fact, he only wanted to ask the police officers for advice on how to file a report with the Czech Police.
After checking the identity of the man and his girlfriend, the officers discovered that the woman was on the national wanted list and a warrant for her arrest had been issued.
The case is therefore being handled by the Czech Police.
A genuine question for people here, do you consider our country to be Slavic?
I personally believe that the Slavs are no longer ethnically or culturally what they used to be, but I would be interested to hear your opinion.
Otherwise, I obviously agree with the meme, it's a pity that Churchill wasn't able to secure the liberation of Prague by the USA :')
Of course, I do not deny that we have a Slavic language.
I don't know, it's quite a question whether a rational person can really believe in something without evidence just because it might potentially be beneficial.
I personally would not consider such a case to be true faith.
I cannot agree with Pascal here; if I'm not mistaken, there are approximately ten thousand different religions in the world.
Which god or gods should one choose?
I would say it's pretty likely that at least one of the thousands of religions out there has at least one god who will punish you badly if you believe in another god.
However, even in the Decalogue, it is stated that there is no other god than Yahweh's.
In such a case, would it not be more rational to refrain from believing in any god than to risk picking the wrong one from the thousands of gods and have the one true god that I didn't pick send me to hell or some similar place?
Other: Voluntary training followed by inclusion in the reserves.
The Swiss model is somewhat similar.
X months of training (in different specializations, X months for one) and under the command of professionals with practical experience.
If you do well, you can get a pro offer.
Something like that would be useful for all the components of the Armed Forces of the Czech Republic.
It could be done in cooperation with the University of Defence.
We can talk about it like this: there is constant collaboration between the education sector and industry, companies fish in schools, and there is a kind of intermingling, when the workforce migrates from educational institutions to employment.
Not only during adolescence, but this process goes on all the time, each of us is always learning something new, moving from one field to another, etc.
A similar overlap should work between the civilian and military sectors.
I see it as a way to build a kind of relationship between the citizen and the army, which is an institution that guarantees that Russia, Germany or even a Mongolian conqueror will never invade here again.
I find it funny how you consider NATO something carved in stone. We have allies and they will defend us if things go wrong.
No, it won't.
Just one election in the United States that messes up their budget, and the whole of NATO will go down the drain.
The British will exchange us for Russian roubles, the Germans will exchange us for Russian gas and the Poles have already shown that all they need to do is show their back and take what they want.
The only thing that has worked as a long-term guarantee of independence is a heavily armed military and a population that is able to operate the military technology of the day.
And today, every teenager can fly a remote-controlled vehicle, so what's the problem.
We don't need border fortifications; they're useless today, but a bored teenager with a remote-controlled device will be able to get through.
How to avoid drowning in the box tsunami
You open the gifts under the Christmas tree, and suddenly your house is full of boxes and packaging?
E-shops that lack packaging materials are making use of this "waste".
A map has been created of shops that will welcome your used boxes.
And not just at Christmas.
All packaging materials are designed to withstand repeated handling.
That's why it's a shame to treat them as single-use waste.
Anyone can bring cardboard boxes, plastic or paper filler to the participating store (the map of the project KAMsNIM.cz includes almost 150 of them).
This will support small businesses, reduce the amount of waste produced and also avoid overfilled blue bins.
The shops themselves welcome the packaging, which is currently in short supply on the market, as well as the saved money, as the price of the packaging cardboard has gone up by 50 per cent in the last period.
In the eyes of eco-conscious customers, I'm strengthening my brand.
One such business is TIERRA VERDE, a manufacturer of organic cosmetics and organic toiletries.
The boxes and the filler material are brought to us in Popůvky near Brno by individuals who have accumulated them at home, but we also hear from companies with which we have arranged regular collection of discarded cardboard.
We use it to pack orders from our e-shop.
Together, individuals and companies are creating a more compassionate world.
Our wish is to preserve the resources and beauty of nature for future generations, says Petra Lopušníková from Tierra.
However, the app www.KAMsNIM.cz shows not only collection points for packaging material.
It serves as a search engine if you need to get rid of anything (where to take separated household waste, where to hand in expired medicines, tyres, worn-out electrical appliances, batteries, light sources, bulky waste, etc.).
All waste can end up in the right place, and in addition, reusable items can find their second home.
The project's map already has more than 100,000 such places.
"Gradually, more and more collection yards, re-use centres, textile containers, food banks, charity shops, SWAPs and other places that help to find a use for things that would otherwise become waste are being set up there," adds Miroslav Kubásek, one of the authors of the application from the Ukliďme Česko (Clean up the Czech Republic) civic association.
I think it's wrong that today's technology is so simple and idiot-proof that children who use computers or phones to play games don't learn basic computer skills.
There has been a recent problem (especially in English articles) that university students do not understand the principle of components on a computer.
Because, for example, Google Photos or Apple's photos app or indeed mobile phones in general just hide the underlying filesystem with its folders and throw everything onto one screen in an app.
They can use the technique from their childhood, but most of all, they should learn something.
Let's rewrite history, seriously
Emmanuel Macron unveiled the priorities of the French EU presidency - which begins in January - at the weekend, and it was spectacular.
Macron spoke for over an hour, during which he unveiled the logo for the presidency, called for the protection of Europeans - at work, on the street - and mentioned so many actions that they cannot be completed in half a year.
French politicians love it, and so do the voters.
Macron's supporters, split between right and left, agree on very little, but they do agree on Europe.
And in France, there will be new elections for the head of state in April.
The election calendar also influenced the priorities themselves.
The French leader, among other things, mentioned that historians should write "one history of Europe" and France is prepared to create conditions for such work by historians.
Several commentators were quick to criticize Macron for pro-European propaganda and rewriting history.
In fact, it is trying to prevent the rewriting of history.
The far-right candidate for the French presidency, Éric Zemmour, is currently touring France with the thesis that the Vichy regime, which collaborated with Hitler during World War II, was not so bad, and he has some success with the French people.
Let us take Macron's idea of a single history textbook seriously and not look at what is happening in France.
Would it not be needed?
Students in European countries are often taught history as a story of us versus them and never as a story of the whole.
Spaniards, French and Czechs learn who defeated whom in which battle.
But if they don't have a wise cantor, they won't learn the broader context of the event.
The film of the year is Quo vadis, Aida?
The Czech "Mice" did not win.
The story, which returns to the 1995 Srebrenica massacre, also won awards for Best Director and Best Actress for Jasna Duričić.
This year at the Karlovy Vary festival, it held the first place in the audience rankings.
In Berlin, the best actor went to Anthony Hopkins for the film The Father.
I'm not very young, I'm not very healthy/fit, and I'm not vaccinated.
It was like "having the flu/being hungover" I had diarrhea for a couple of days and didn't really feel like smoking...
It was worse than a normal cold.
I don't get diarrhea with the flu.
(Only my personal experience. I'm not saying that's the case for everyone.)
Christmas book tips
The Christmas double issue, out on December 20, will contain the traditional literary supplement.
And with it, cultural tips.
We are attaching the book to this digital edition for you, our subscribers, so that you have enough time to buy the books as Christmas gifts.
Prose texts following the previous similar collection Petříček Sellier & Petříček Bellot.
Another portion of observations of the world and descriptions of ordinary things with extraordinary poetic attention to detail, depth and atmosphere.
In his second novel, photographer Šesták tried to capture the essence of a small town and Czech society.
It's a story of a return to one's roots that turns out to be just a wished-for illusion.
The bohemist and comparatist transfers the fairy tale of Little Red Riding Hood into the setting of a contemporary village.
Her delivery of the brutality exceeds the folk versions and escalates into a horror of emotional emptiness.
And that the path back to instincts is shorter than we are willing to admit
In his penultimate novel, the author tells a much less sentimental story about returning from emigration than we are used to hearing.
Those who stayed and those who left know too little about each other to make a marriage work.
The trains start running according to the new timetable, in some places the operators will change
From Sunday, trains will run according to the new timetable on the railways.
The biggest change is the replacement of carriers on some routes, for example between Ústí nad Labem and Kolín, where instead of ČD, RegioJet will start operating.
For most of the lines, only the departure time will be changed, and the route will be changed only slightly.
There will also be tens of new trains on the tracks.
The transport companies started to sell tickets already in the autumn.
Czech Railways are planning to run an average of 6,783 passenger trains a day in the new timetable, including an average of 478 long-distance trains a day.
During the new timetable, trains will cover approximately 118 million kilometres.
In addition to domestic connections, the new timetable will also include routes to Germany, Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, Austria and Switzerland.
The company is introducing dozens of new trains as part of the new timetable.
The main innovation will be the InterJet trains, which will run on the Prague-Cheb route.
The other new trains will be deployed in northern Moravia or western Bohemia.
The transport company will also traditionally increase ticket prices next year, by an average of 3.2 percent.
The railways take inflation into account in their fares every year.
The biggest change in the RegioJet timetable is the introduction of the R23 Ústí nad Labem – Mělník – Nymburk – Kolín line.
The transport company will replace České dráhy following its success in the Ministry of Transport’s competition.
RegioJet will run a total of 16 trains a day, eight in each direction.
Other changes affect long-distance services between Prague and Brno, which from Sunday will also stop at Havlíčkův Brod, Žďár nad Sázavou and Kolín.
Leo Express has kept its 16 connections, two return connections to Slovakia and weekend connections to Krakow.
According to the spokesperson, Emil Sedlárik, the transport company tried to keep the departure times of its long-distance trains as similar as possible despite the planned strike action.
The operation of Arriva and other train operators should continue without major changes.
The transport operator will also be replaced on some regional lines.
There will be changes for travellers, for example in Českolipsko, where instead of the Czech Railways, the Trilex trains of the German company Die Länderbahn will run on the route from Mladá Boleslav via Česká Lípa to Rumburk.
Passengers will also be able to use a single ticket on the railways in the second year.
Like the Czech Railways, their price will increase by inflation of 3.2 percent.
I have to disagree.
Don't we learn from the other side's point of view?
Everywhere we hear about how hard they had to fight for their rights, how they were oppressed and had to work hard and die.
In my lifetime, I have never heard a teaching from the perspective of the slave's side or from that time. No one is defending it, just condemning it.
No one tells you in school that black people often sold other black people into slavery, and that they were often the worst slavers.
No one teaches you at school that the colonisers often bought the land from the Indians; all they tell you is how brutally we, the Europeans, exterminated them, while they were already killing each other.
I also spent some time in the USA, directly in the schools, both in the north and in the south.
I have not come across anyone deliberately covering up facts, but I have heard of it happening in the past, and I think it is a problem, and I don't deny it (e.g. in Japan, WW2 atrocities are a bit of a taboo).
My point was more that history isn't black and white, and we tend to look at it through a modern lens without understanding.
History doesn't care about people's feelings, it is what it is and I think it's a fatal error to judge without looking at it in the context of the time.
On the other hand, we should learn from it and never do it again.
By the way, while we're on the subject of the southern states, yes, the Confederate flag and famous slave owners are quite popular there, on the other hand, they also had some good successes, and it seemed absurd to me to reject them.
Moreover, the North was not much better, as many people idealize it today.
And a lot of people also forget that not everyone in the South was a slave owner, and a lot of things went against them as well.
I wouldn't compare this to the Russians, they deliberately omit some facts, they lie and manipulate, moreover, our point of view doesn't exist there (there was a video on YT from a TV station where someone was silenced who started talking about our legionaries and 1968).
What I found funny about US schools was the rise of Marxism and the idealization of communism, something that their country has never experienced.
Overall, I found that at some universities it was terrible, those students were pretty radicalized, and those schools often supported them in it.
And when I imagine that these people will be much older one day, I feel a little bit sick at the thought that this could be the voice of the majority, because it is among the young and even in the ruling elite.
It seems to me that feminism, for example, has already achieved what it had to and is no longer about the same things, it has become radicalised.
Currently, feminists are those who have nothing to do with him and ignore basic biological facts, as well as other groups such as LGBT, which leads to radicalisation on the other side, often leading to opposition to quite reasonable things.
Moreover, the more radical someone is, the more likely they are to be heard.
However, in conclusion, I have not met anyone who has condemned me for colonialism or slavery.
I have met more bad geography, though, and that was a two-way street :D
Not because I don't like it here, but because, in my opinion, it is completely pointless.
Am I supposed to be proud of something I couldn't do on my own?
Also, I consider the concept of nationality in general to be unnecessary in terms of personal identity.
If there's anything that connects me to people, it's interests, views on the world and shared experiences, not where we were born.
I am not a believer, but from what I know, I can tell you this: We have two Greek-Catholic parishes here, one is Ukrainian and the other is Slovak.
That Slovak priest is a really nice guy, his sermons are more about theology than politics, but then he always brings up some nonsense about the coronavirus, saying that everyone should be ashamed.
Then there is, of course, the Czechoslovak Hussite Church.
Officially, they are Protestants, but in fact, they were born out of Catholic Modernism and are effectively Catholics without a pope.
I know a lot of people who are Catholic, but they go to Hussite services because it is theologically very similar, but the members are usually more liberal.
They have a beautiful and historically very valuable functionalist church on Botanická street.
Otherwise, the church of St. Michael on the Dominican Square belongs to the Dominicans and they even celebrate mass in Latin there every Sunday at 15:00, as it was done before Vatican II.
The flame from Bethlehem is in the Czech Republic, the scouts took it from Austria
Břeclav - The flame that was lit in Bethlehem, where, according to Christian tradition, Jesus Christ was born, is in the Czech Republic.
However, the scouts did not go to Vienna due to the COVID-19 pandemic, and in the morning, they took him from their Austrian colleagues at the Reintal – Břeclav border crossing.
They took it from him at the border last year.
The Bethlehem Light is a beautiful Christmas tradition that we participate in every year with the department, and I look forward to it very much.
It is an honour for me to have been chosen, said scout Amálie Budíková to the journalists present.
While last year the handover took place at the Mikulov-Drasenhofen border crossing, directly on the border bridge, this year it will take place at the Reintal - Břeclav border crossing in the car park.
The scouts, however, usually travel by train to Vienna.
The distribution of the flame across the Czech Republic will remain the same.
The scouts traditionally set off with the Bethlehem light by train first to Brno, where they hand it over to the diocesan bishop Vojtěch Cikrle.
On Saturday, 18 December, scout couriers will deliver the lights on selected express and passenger trains.
The light will be taken over by local scouts or volunteers in stations, who will then spread the flame throughout the Czech Republic, even to places where there are no railways.
This year, too, scouts must comply with the current measures to prevent the spread of the coronavirus.
It is much the same as last year.
We are recommending both the delivery teams and the organizers of local events to of course wear face masks, try to keep their distance, be as few as possible, not to sing together, in other words, to behave in a way that is as safe as possible, described the spokesperson of the Betlémské světlo event, Zuzana Hrbková.
The tradition of the Bethlehem Light, which travels through Europe, was born in Austria in 1986.
The aim is to spread the idea of peace, friendship and harmony along with the flame.
For believers, the light of Bethlehem is a symbol of hope, a light that overcomes the darkness.
In the Czech Republic, the scouts and scouts have been taking care of its spread for more than 30 years.
Hundreds of volunteers make the event possible, and the flame is a symbol of selflessness and human solidarity.
All the news, including the list of places where people can get the flame, can be found on the website www.betlemskesvetlo.cz.
I don't have an economic education, so I don't know the basics of economics, which confirm that subsidies are a cancer of the economy, but I don't think that subsidies as a whole would be a problem.
The development of infrastructure, ecology (e.g. water retention), healthcare and education will put the money to good use, I just don't understand why the money is being given to agriculture, industry and companies in general.
As mentioned, it produces excess product and disrupts the free market and "the natural life of a company."
I myself work in a factory where there are a million signs in the corridors saying "xy financed/co-financed by the xy project" and such a company is simply artificially kept alive.
This is not support for a company that employs x people, this is holding back development where this company is hanging on by a thread and taking orders/employees from companies that could grow and be more productive after its demise.
Totally agree, it's awful.
Even a person who was born in the Internet age can fall for some trick or trap - especially an advertisement.
I think that online ads don't work on me, but then I find myself being influenced by them anyway - it's just so sophisticated that you can't avoid it.
That is why I support the radical voices in the European Parliament that currently want to impose a complete ban on targeted advertising...
It is all rubbish, says the classic - I would ban the Internet.
I have a feeling that this virus has its roots in (but mainly in point 1):
1. "I won't believe in something that most people believe in and makes sense, I'm not a sheep after all, I'd rather believe in something that's less likely, it doesn't make much sense, but it's important that I have my own original opinion on which I'll claim is critical thinking"
2. "I won't believe everything the media says"
3. "I don't trust politicians"
TV has abandoned the Christmas movie trend, with 200 new ones premiering this year
Los Angeles - Movie theaters, television networks and streaming platforms in the United States and other English-speaking countries have fallen for the trend of Christmas movies and this year are premiering a record more than 200 to their viewers.
The operator of the IMDb film database counted them.
The genre of Christmas family and romantic films has been scoring with the public in recent years and has seen a significant increase in viewership, so more and more of these films are being made.
This year, four times as many Christmas films were made as in 2011 and twice as many as five years ago.
The IMDb database, however, only counts those films that have the word Christmas in their title, so there are actually a lot more Christmas movies out there.
The movies that people traditionally associate with Christmas have always been there.
In the Czech Republic, this period is mainly associated with fairy tales, while around the world, films such as Home Alone, Love Actually or the classic Christmas story It's a Wonderful Life from 1946 are popular.
The real boom in Christmas films began in 2009, when the American cable television channel Hallmark came up with a special film series, the BBC website recalled.
Her Christmas project called Countdown to Christmas included four films and was very successful.
This year, the station started to tune its viewers in for Christmas on October 22, and will present a total of 42 Christmas films.
Competitor network Lifetime has 35 new holiday-themed films on its schedule this year, and popular streaming platforms like Netflix are also contributing to the overall total.
"At this magical time of year, it doesn't matter so much about the story, it's just important that there's a lot of Christmas trees in the background and it's snowing," said Brandon Gray, author of the book I'll Be Home for Christmas Movies.
"For the audience, it's a form of escape and a way to feel a little bit of respite for at least two hours in the midst of all of the craziness of the holidays and the craziness of the world we've been living in for the past couple of years," Gray added.
According to him, for example, the Hallmark channel uses the same recipe for its films, which is uniform, but successful.
You have two people who fall in love, but then, about half an hour before the end, there is a misunderstanding, which is successfully resolved and the two of them kiss.
That's the way it goes round and round, and as long as all the films look the same and have the same atmosphere, people are going to watch them one after another, adds Gray.
Mazepin tested positive for Covid-19 and will not take part in the final F1 race.
Only 19 drivers will take part in the Formula 1 Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
Nikita Mazepin has tested positive for Covid-19 and will not take part in the final race of the season.
The Haas team will only send one car out onto the track.
In the final race of the season, he was aiming for a better finish than the 20th place he qualified for.
However, Russian Nikita Mazepin from Haas will not take part in the Abu Dhabi Grand Prix.
He had tested positive for Covid-19.
Only 19 cars will appear on the starting grid, with Mick Schumacher, Mazepin's team-mate, starting from the back of the grid, and Max Verstappen, who is in direct competition with Lewis Hamilton for the title, starting from pole.
According to Haas, Mazepin is doing well and is not showing any symptoms.
Nikita is in good physical shape because he was asymptomatic.
He is now in self-isolation and will follow the guidance of the relevant public health authorities, with safety being the overriding priority for all involved," his representatives said in a statement to formula1.com.
Haas will not send a reserve driver to the race, nor can they.
A potential substitute would have to qualify or race in another part of the weekend.
The first racer does not have COVID-19.
At the start of the just-ended season, Kimi Räikkönen had covid-19, and last year Sergio Pérez and Lewis Hamilton tested positive.
You can also get locked up for this.
And everyone will be stolen from, said the boss.
From a legal point of view, Covid is on the list of infectious diseases.
That is to say, in the same group as HIV, the plague, yellow fever or typhus.
§ 152 Dissemination of a Contagious Human Disease
(1) Any person who intentionally causes or increases the risk of the introduction or spread of an infectious disease in humans shall be punished by imprisonment for a term of six months to three years, a fine or confiscation of property.
(2) A sentence of imprisonment for two years to eight years will be imposed on the offender,
(c) commits an act in breach of an important duty arising out of his employment, profession, position or function, or imposed on him by law, or
d) cause serious injury to health.
(3) A sentence of imprisonment for three to ten years shall be imposed on an offender who inflicts serious injury to the health of at least two persons or death as a result of the act referred to in paragraph 1.
(4) The perpetrator will be sentenced to a prison term of five to twelve years, if the act mentioned in subsection (1) results in the death of at least two persons.
Quiz: Why do failing companies often have women at the helm and what should your boss never ask you to do
The wage gap between men and women, i.e. the so-called gender pay gap, has been one of the highest in the EU in the Czech Republic for a long time.
Where are the biggest differences?
And in what age category and industry do women earn the least compared to men?
Test your knowledge on pay inequality.
Gold, silver and 150 diamonds: The price of the most expensive sweater will shock you!
It's a bit like a mobile jewellery store, and the creator has put six months of work and all his savings into it.
"I had a vision of what I wanted to create, but little experience, sweaters were never really worn back home," admits Liban, who spent 3,000 hours working on his creation over the course of six months.
The silk was purchased in Italy, the 24-carat gold thread in France, and the 2000 decorative crystals were provided by Swarowski.
The silver stars were then adorned with 150 diamonds.
"It's made of wool and cotton, but the silk gives it a certain softness," says the creator of the garment, which he does not recommend washing.
And there is another catch to it.
"I'm completely broke, I have to sell the sweater as soon as possible," admits Liban.
If successful, it will set a world record.
The previous most expensive sweater, sold five years ago, cost "only" 720,000 Czech crowns.
If the Ministry of Health is detached from reality, it doesn't really matter - it will have the faulty circuit repaired and replaced with a new one.
The fact is that the departure of FB from Europe would help its non-Russian part (which is under the influence of Russia) a lot.
I think it would clean up the social climate pretty well.
The channels of “Soviet brotherly help” to some of our political parties and representatives could also be clarified.
Then the people who vote for them would also have a clear idea of whose interests they are actually serving.
It's a shame that it doesn't also own TikTok.
A lot of young people would suddenly and with great surprise discover that the sun is shining outside...
Trump directly encouraged the torture of suspects, and he is now reaping what he has sown.
About the situation in the USA with a leading African-American reporter.
In the United States, new cases of police violence are coming to light, this time during nationwide protests.
Protests sparked by the death of African American George Floyd at the hands of a police officer during an arrest have opened up a debate on systemic racism, police work and cases of brutality against America's minority groups.
Lenka Kabrhelová talks to one of the leading African-American journalists, The Atlantic reporter Adam Serwer.
But how would funding be increased?
The union is forcing money down our throats in the form of subsidies.
If it stops doing that, we won't have that money.
I really don't see how stopping the EU giving us money would cause us to spend that money on something else...
You can argue that the money from the grants could have been used better, but that is a different discussion.
Is it even possible for a pub not to pay taxes?
Is it even possible for a pub to cut taxes?
After all, when a piece of meat passes veterinary inspection, it must be recorded somewhere, and it can't just disappear, can it?
Similarly, Prazdroj and Jelínek probably do not produce special alcohol for the black market.
But I often don't get a receipt, or they take it back and throw it away.
The government approved the deployment of up to 150 soldiers to help Poland.
The scientists, explorers and drone pilots could be on their way before Christmas, with the mission approved for six months.
They will help their Polish colleagues to protect the border with Belarus and build the planned fence.
Poland has officially asked for help from NATO states in connection with months-long activities of the Belarusian regime, which invites citizens of the Middle Eastern countries to its territory with the false promise of an easy crossing of the EU's border.
British and Estonian soldiers are already operating on Polish territory.
Is the Omikron mutation spreading in southern Moravia?
Public Health are investigating another case of a child from Adam's.
"We currently have another suspected case of this variant in another child at Adam's school, the reception class.
There is no evidence of direct contact with previous cases from the Adamov elementary school," said Ciupek.
There were six cases in the region last week.
"We are still awaiting official confirmation of the variant in our six cases - this is being conducted by the National Reference Laboratory for Influenza and Non-influenza Viruses of the State Institute for Health Protection in Prague," said the director.
She added that it concerns two nurses from the same department of the Brno University Hospital and two children of one of them, as well as two eleven-year-old pupils of the Adamov primary school.
There is no connection between the cases from Brno and Adam.
According to the director, three of them have mild symptoms and four are asymptomatic.
No one with suspicion of Omicron has travelled abroad
None of them had travelled abroad, nor had anyone in their families, nor had they come into contact with anyone who had been abroad.
There is no link to the water polo championship for anyone mentioned, said Ciupek.
Chief hygienist Pavla Svrčinová has previously stated that an international water polo tournament held in Brno a few weeks ago is being investigated.
There were players from South Africa, and one Belgian player who became ill after returning.
California will limit gun sales.
It wants to follow Texas' lead on abortion bans.
California Gov. Gavin Newsom on Saturday announced a plan to ban the sale and manufacture of some guns in the nation's most populous state using the legal mechanism Texas used in its controversial abortion law that bans the procedure once a fetal heartbeat is detected.
People would then be able to sue anyone who manufactures or sells assault weapons or homemade firearms in California for damages.
Newsom's announcement came in response to a Friday ruling by the U.S. Supreme Court that allowed a Texas abortion ban to remain in place, despite being at odds with a nearly 50-year-old precedent that established the right to an abortion nationwide through about the 24th week of pregnancy.
However, the court was not ruling on the constitutionality of the entire law, but on a technical issue arising from the innovative design of the measure.
In this case, however, enforcement of the ban was handed over to the public, making it impossible for the Texas Republicans to challenge it through the courts.
"I am outraged by yesterday's (Friday) U.S. Supreme Court decision to allow Texas' ban on most abortions to remain in place and to largely endorse Texas' maneuver to protect its law," the California governor said.
"If states can now block review of their laws by federal courts, California will use that authority to save lives," Newsom continued.
He reportedly told his subordinates to work with the state parliament and the justice minister on a measure that would allow citizens to enforce the ban on assault rifles and so-called ghost guns.
These are home-made weapons that have no serial numbers and can be used to circumvent regulations.
Newsom wants to give "private citizens" the right to demand damages of at least $10,000 and court costs from anyone who manufactures, distributes or sells assault rifles, "ghost gun" parts or kits to make them in California.
"If the most effective way to keep these deadly weapons off our streets is to create a private right of action, then that's exactly what we should do," the California governor said.
The AP notes that California has banned the manufacture and sale of some military-style weapons for decades, but a federal judge blocked the state's ban as unconstitutional in June.
If the state were now to reinstate the ban using the Texas model, it would confirm the words of liberal Supreme Court Justice Sonia Sotomayor, who in a dissent to Friday's majority ruling warned against expanding the legal mechanism to other U.S. states.
The Supreme Court, however, did not give Texas's abortion ban total immunity from judicial review, allowing abortion clinics to proceed with lawsuits against select officials in the southern U.S. state.
Every emergency vaccination has a public testing phase, where the vaccination scheme is gradually worked out, and the vaccines themselves are improved based on the results.
For example, a large-scale study on the effects of 4 doses has already been rolled out in Israel.
And according to these studies, in most patients there is a fivefold increase in antibodies, which already has the long-term effect you mentioned.
Just like any other vaccine, it will have its own vaccination schedule, but it's too early for that now.
Another fact is that a new vaccine, based on an inactivated virus, should soon come to the market, which, according to the manufacturer's specifications, promises to be up to 10 times more effective.
Leave the amount of content as it is.
But re-examine what is being taught.
Since the days of Maria Theresa, our civilization and technology have progressed a little, and learning phone books by heart and copying textbooks into notebooks doesn't make much sense and is a real waste of time.
They could really do with some serious cutting back in these areas.
On the other hand, how many people leave the workforce with some basic financial literacy?
And other things that you will need to live?
How can I watch the Champions League online legally?
Do you know if there is an online service here in the Czech Republic that would allow me to watch the Champions League for a fee?
We have a Netbox at home and I pay for the Telly sports package for the Spanish and English football leagues.
However, this does not include the UEFA Champions League.
I think O2 offers the Champions League, but I don't want to change my TV and internet provider.
Poland threatens to stop paying into EU budget
According to Ziobro, the European Commission would be acting against the law if it were to use its new powers to stop the payment of money to Poland due to a dispute over the rule of law.
The Commission has already delayed the approval of the Polish plan to draw 36 billion euros from the EU fund for the recovery of economies hit by the Covid-19 pandemic.
And it is under pressure from the European Parliament to go further and use a mechanism that can withhold EU funds from countries that break the rule-of-law principles.
"Poland should respond to this blackmail by the EU with a veto in all matters that require unanimity," said Ziobro, head of the small Solidarna Polska party, without whose votes the current government would lose its narrow majority in the lower house of parliament.
"Poland should also consider its obligations in the EU's energy and climate policy, which lead to a drastic increase in energy prices," added Ziobro.
If the dispute continues, I will ask Poland to stop its contributions to the EU.
It would be justified given the fact that the EU is illegally withholding funds from the common budget to which we also contribute, added the Polish minister.
Its approach to the EU is more radical than that of the ruling Law and Justice party.
According to the European Commission, the changes to the Polish justice system during Ziobro's tenure threaten its independence and subordinate it to politicians.
According to Ziobro, Brussels is setting "impossible conditions, because its goal is not a state of law, but a change of government in Poland".
Warsaw is facing a "political dictatorship enforced by blackmail and a bid to overturn the democratic decision of several million Poles," Ziobro also said.
He said that Poland should be a member of such an EU that is based on the partnership of sovereign states and not on the rule of the strongest and a Brussels bureaucracy that is not under democratic control.
He said his party would never agree to any concessions to Brussels that would limit Poland's sovereignty.
"We will never agree to Poland having the status of a colony," he said.
But to get to grips with it... We have one type of cheese at four different locations in our Lidl stores.
I didn't look at other things, I met a yogurt a couple of times, I just needed cheese and parmesan, after ten minutes at the milk aisles I gave up and asked.
They had it, it's true, in that narrow sector there were all the selected, less common and special cheeses, but it was between the vegetables and the lactose-free zone...
If I can avoid it, I won't go to any market, action or no action, the golden shop on the square doesn't have such a selection, but they usually have everything I need, and it's well organised, so I'm done in ten minutes.
I went to Lidl to buy my holiday.
And I don't care anymore.
I have watched for two years as data is handled here like manure, and most of the anti-vaxxers are just a little bit off target compared to most of the pro-vaxxers.
There is a rational debate going on at the expert level, but only extreme views are making it into the public space.
It's always from wall to wall.
Binary thinking: vaccination will save us, vaccination is useless.
To ban everything, to allow everything.
Color charts instead of robust analysis.
Apples and oranges.
This state does it this way, and we do it this way.
But nobody is talking about the fact that the data collection methodology is different in those two states.
Phew, I got it off my chest.
Sorry for the outburst and I wish you all a nice day.
When I was a child, I was punished with a wooden spoon.
It was never about the grades, it was mostly because I repeatedly refused to listen and misbehaved (read instead of going to bed, argued with my brother, etc).
At the same time, I have never been punished without a warning. My mother always threatened that if I do it again, I will get a spanking (and sometimes, even after another "scolding" with the spoon, she only brought it and placed it so that I could see it).
Only after I repeatedly refused to listen did I get a few slaps on the butt (through clothing).
I personally think that physical punishment (in a reasonable manner and to a reasonable extent) is beneficial, because the child reacts to it much more than to words.
I think the important part is the warning section, because it gives the child a way to choose whether or not to ignore it and get it, or to improve and not get the punishment.
I usually only needed a warning before I started listening.
Defence of the system
When the prominent Czech lawyer and constitutional court judge Vojtěch Cepl answered a journalist's question in 1999 about what the Czech constitution meant to him - whether it was a sacred document to which one swore an oath and which one was taught about at school from a young age, or, on the contrary, an agreement that can be changed if necessary - he definitely favoured the former.
We once agreed in the constitution on the democratic rules of our life, which at the same time define who we are as a state and its citizens, and it is better to avoid changes.
And imagine: some nations actually like their rules.
Just like Czechs like dumplings with pork and cabbage, Vojtěch Cepl said back then.
However, lawyers are increasingly of the opinion that the Czech Constitution needs to be changed.
Over the years, it has been tested by situations that its creators (including Vojtěch Cepl) could not predict, such as the behaviour of the directly elected president.
However, Cepl was right about one thing.
Everything we know about such documents suggests that political interventions in their texts must be deliberate.
The Institute needs to be understood and actively defended, only then can it be the key to dealing with most of the crises that have faced societies throughout history.
A constitution is, among other things, a set of rules of government, which sets limits on what politicians can do.
We are afraid that it will be misused against minorities or individuals, so we tie the politicians' hands with prohibitions.
At the same time, the constitutional texts also allow politicians to use their power.
Covid doesn't discriminate, several-month-old baby is fighting for its life in Brno University Hospital
Although it is known that the coronavirus is less severe in children, there are also severe cases that the hospital has been dealing with mainly recently.
"We know that children are at less risk and are less affected than adults. We talk about 2 to 5 percent compared to adults," said Petr Dominik, Head of the Clinic of Paediatric Anaesthesiology and Resuscitation at Brno University Hospital and Faculty of Medicine at Masaryk University, to Novinky.
The course is usually much simpler, lighter, and often symptom-free.
But there are children who are severely affected by the coronavirus, which we have seen, especially in recent times," added Dominik.
According to the doctor, it is about dozens of children who need mild supportive care.
It takes place at a children's infectious disease clinic.
Children who are very seriously ill with the coronavirus have only recently been admitted to the ICU.
Children with post-Covid syndromes have been admitted to the ward continuously throughout the year, according to the doctor.
"Now we're seeing an increase in children with acute COVID pneumonias, which means an inflammation of the lung that requires a stay in the intensive care unit," he said, adding that the illness affects not only adults but also adolescents and infants as young as a few months old.
Children are also in critical condition due to COVID-19 in hospitals.
"We currently have a child of several months of age and an adolescent in our care," said the director.
However, she is pleased that the children's hospital at FN Brno has not recorded any child deaths from the coronavirus.
According to the available data, six children aged 0 to 14 died in the Czech Republic by December 6.
According to Dominik, in a children's hospital - not just in the coronavirus department - a psychologist is an integral part of the team.
It also points out that just like in adults, vaccination also reduces the severity of the disease and the incidence of post-COVID-19 syndrome in children.
"That's why we recommend the vaccine for children as well," the doctor added.
In the quiet zone, you can only walk on designated paths.
But the quiet zones aren't that large.
They are visible on the tourist map on mapy.cz.
In general, in national parks outside the quiet zone you can go anywhere (but don't climb over the fence into the enclosure).
Skiing/cycling in the woods off-piste is not allowed anywhere, unless you have an exception (but of course it's not really enforced outside of national parks).
How does a conductor practice?
The music is playing in my head, laughs Josef Kurfiřt.
He was weaned on the Liberec Opera and originally played the horn.
As a singer, he can sing almost the entire repertoire, and as a conductor, he works not only in the Liberec F. X. Šalda Theatre, but also, for example, in Pilsen in the Josef Kajetán Tyl Theatre.
He works with the Hradec Philharmonic, the Film Philharmonic or the Podkrkonoše Symphony Orchestra.
China is creating the impression that it has contained the outbreak and that the authoritarian regime is better equipped to deal with the crisis
Sinologist Jirouš: China is building the impression that it has handled the outbreak and that the authoritarian regime is better able to deal with the crisis.
China launched a medical and political offensive.
A few months ago, Beijing was on the receiving end of criticism for failing to contain an outbreak that turned into a global pandemic.
Now, the country is reporting zero new infections.
Countries including the Czech Republic are competing for Chinese protective equipment, and Chinese doctors are helping to fight the coronavirus in many places, including the worst-hit Italy.
How should we perceive Beijing's willingness?
Is it friendly support or is the communist regime trying to improve its image in the world?
He meets a friend of a friend and says to him, "Hey, do you want an elephant?"
I have it and it's great.
The wife is happy because it mows the lawn, washes the car, and the children play with it.
No, it's just great.
If you want, I'll sell you an elephant for 5000.
A mate: "Yeah, I'll do it, it'll be great..."
After some time, they meet again and the one who bought it complains: you bastards, what did you sell the elephant for????
The lawn is torn up, there are huge piles of horse manure everywhere, the car is broken down, the kids are scared of it and the wife wants a divorce.
The one who sold it said: "You don't talk about an elephant like that, you won't sell an elephant like that..."
World events are controlled by the great powers.
Despite the equality of sovereign states, it is the great powers that determine the course of international events.
Europe can only become a great power if it works on its integration.
It works at the economic and political level (on selected issues), but military integration is still lacking.
I personally believe that Europe is heading towards federalism.
It won't be in 10 or 15 or 20 years.
But in the middle of the century, the mood will be different and it will happen.
It also occurred to me, and it's quite possible.
I'm not an expert in Czech, so maybe I'm splitting hairs.
I'm just going by the fact that an ellipse usually includes 2 different units on the same level.
I will borrow an example from another comment, "Spanish oranges and mandarins," where it is clear that both are from Spain, whereas with "Spanish fruit and mandarins" it is not clear that the mandarins are from Spain.
Plus, I base it on the fact that the sentence reads "all American might" which includes their weapons, and I know that American complexes are only operated by Americans.
In other words, I expect that it's already included in that broad term and it doesn't need to be further specified for U.S. forces.
But again, just playing with words:D
Whatever the case, it's an absurd request
A 5-magnitude earthquake was recorded in Tokyo.
Japan's capital Tokyo and surrounding areas were hit by an earthquake measuring 5.0 on the Richter scale on Sunday.
Witnesses said buildings shook in the capital, but no damage has been reported so far.
A tsunami warning was not issued, Reuters reported.
British Vicki Holland tortured capuchin monkey Milly
Chilling footage shows the moment a terrified monkey cowered in a toilet before its heartless owner flushed her down and laughed.
Holland also fed the monkeys sausages, kebabs and hamburgers, regardless of their actual nutritional needs.
Gwent Magistrates Court has now banned her from keeping animals for life, The Sun reports.
Primate rehabilitation experts caring for Milly after her ordeal say they have never seen such a terrified cosmonaut.
Milly spent almost two years in rehabilitation with the staff at Monkey World in Dorset and is now happily playing with another rescued monkey called Moon.
The mother-of-four pleaded guilty to two charges of causing unnecessary suffering to a protected animal.
She was handed a 12-week prison sentence, suspended for one year, at Gwent Magistrates' Court.
Holland was also sentenced to 120 hours of unpaid work, she was banned from keeping animals for life and must pay 12,000 Czech crowns in court costs.
Leader of the Small Monkeys team that rehabilitated the abused animal, Steph Sawyer, said: "Milly is doing well but the rehabilitation will continue."
It took Milly a while to get used to people again.
She cowered and hid from everyone she met, and any loud sound or sudden movement caused her to scream.
The monkey refused to eat for a long time.
Even now, when she's settled and happy with her mate, the sight of new people can still send her into a panic.
The psychological scars of the abuse will stay with her forever, Sawyer adds.
The abuse of Milly came to light when police in Gwent found the shocking footage on the woman's phone following a drugs raid on her home.
The footage shows Milly using vulgar language.
In another video, Ms. Holland is heard offering the monkey cocaine, saying, "Do you want some cocaine?"
So lick my fingers.
In May, she and her partner Russell Cox, 43, pleaded guilty to possession of cocaine with intent to supply.
She was found to have £1,600 worth of cocaine (about 50,000 Czech crowns) hidden in Kinder eggs in her home.
Cox was jailed for 30 months and Holland received a suspended sentence of 20 months.
And what amazing concepts will you learn three times in a row if you bravely skip the entire 20th century?
Like, you get the same things in first grade that you get in sixth grade?
And all of this is killing the idea of biffo, where nobody, with the exception of a few, cares whether you can do it or understand it.
Mainly to write a test on 1 and then it doesn't matter to anyone.
Go out and randomly ask people on the street if they can solve the character of the roots of a quadratic equation and the coefficients.
Everyone goes through it, and the absolute majority won't bat an eyelid and will tell you that they couldn't care less.
So what the fuck are they learning?
I'm a big fan of general overviews and the fact is that people don't want to and don't need to.
And in that moment, it's pointless and you'll never get it into them anyway.
Some of it is learned for the many people who will need that thing.
But as for the remark that you don't need all this stuff at the machine, I meant it absolutely seriously... ...because you don't need it.
And we're slowly getting to the point where not knowing is a sign of punk.
(Which is probably due to our communist past and our resentment of intellectuals and elites) However, the price of having barbarians standing by those machines is just too high.
If only the journalists knew how to count, then Covid probably wouldn't have reached these dimensions.
At first glance: The war between Kadri and Andrey continues!
Which is the main reason why Switzerland can't leave right now," answered Andrea on Instagram in Stories to all-purpose questions from curious fans, what disappointed her so much in Kadri that she decided to end all contact and even block him on social networks.
From the start of the experiment, Kadri and Andreou were at each other's throats.
The main problem was the fact that Kadri lived and worked in Switzerland and his idea was that Andrea should move there, at least until he moved back to the Czech Republic for good.
She resolutely rejected this.
As can be seen, their relationship did not end in love, but rather turned into mutual disrespect and hatred.
It was your planned attack! Kadri fired back in reaction to Andrea's accusations of lies, gambling, and debt.
Kadri's supposed honesty now doesn't sit well with his ex-wife or even his younger sister, Linda.
She decided to publicly defend her brother.
I don't normally talk about these things, and we never really talked about these things in the family.
I certainly don't want to elicit any pity.
But when I see someone trying to publicly hurt and tarnish the name of someone I love so much, I can't just let it go!
I'm sorry that I have to do this in this way, but I would like to publicly thank my brother Kadri for making a character out of himself and helping our family when we needed it most, despite his young age.
It makes me even more upset when I have to read such false information, which is probably taken out of context.
I wish that everyone could know Kadri the way I do, and the way our loved ones and family do, in response to Andrey's words.
I'm really grateful to him for everything!
Of course people will believe what they read, but the most important thing is that we, his family, love him more than anything and we know the truth and we know how it really was, she added.
The drunken thief climbed up the outside of the building to the fifth floor.
Believe it or not, it was for a reason.
Chao started his burglary spree in a parking lot of a residential area, where he tried to break into several cars.
According to available information, he eventually stole less than CZK 330 from one vehicle.
He couldn't think of anything better to do than to climb up to the fifth floor and climb into the apartment through the open window.
There, he stole two bananas.
He is then captured on CCTV leaving the scene of the crime and walking down the street eating a banana.
When the apartment owner woke up in the morning, he discovered that the bananas were not where they were, and he called the police.
She was then detained by Cchaa.
The man admitted to drinking some alcohol on the day in question.
Since he needed money, he decided to rob in a drunken state.
The matter is currently under investigation.
The drunk climbed up the facade to the 5th floor, where he stole two bananas.
The pandemic law is time-limited and its effect is linked to the state of pandemic preparedness.
When it is repealed, the law will no longer be in effect.
The law does restrict the scope of the business
Is that not a good enough reason?
The right to assemble will be restricted, but not abolished.
More than 60 per cent of voters turned out for Saturday's elections to the councils of four municipalities
On Saturday, new councillors were elected in the municipalities of Komňa in Uherskohradišť district, Lužice in the Most district, Nová Ves in the Liberec district and in Rovné in the Pelhřimov district.
The number of representatives in these municipalities has fallen below the number set by law, or the elected council has collapsed.
A total of 99 candidates competed for the 28 seats on Saturday.
The average age of the newly elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69 years old, the youngest 33 years old.
Processing the results of Saturday's elections symbolically closes a fairly difficult, but successful year for us.
There were a total of four new or repeat elections to municipal councils, and the very closely watched elections to the Chamber of Deputies, said the deputy chairwoman of the Czech Statistical Office, Eva Krumpová.
She pointed out that due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the elections were more challenging in terms of equipment and personnel security.
In Komňa, in Uherskohradišť, Saturday's election was won by the Association of Independent Candidates, which won 27.76 percent of the votes and two seats in the seven-member council.
The STAN candidate received 24.84% of the votes, which also means two seats.
Two seats in the council were also won by Občané pro Komňu, who received 18.52 percent of the vote.
Jana Křižková, the current mayor of the town, who is a member of the Soukromníci party, was also re-elected to the council.
Komňané - independent candidates - won one seat on the council.
75.48 per cent of the eligible voters cast their votes.
The association Pro Rovnou won in the village of Rovná in Pelhřimov.
It won 50.50% of the votes, which means four seats out of seven.
Two representatives from the Association of Independent Candidates 1 and one from the Association of Independent Candidates 2 were also elected to the municipal council.
Turnout was 93.62 percent.
The Lužice and Svinčice association, led by mayor Jindřich John, again won the repeated elections in Lužice on Mostecko.
It received 56.73% of the votes and, just like in 2018, it has four seats in the seven-member council.
The second place went to Obec pro lide, which received 43.27 percent of the vote, and will have three representatives in the council.
76.7% of voters went to the polls.
Independent candidates Naděje pro Novou Ves won the election in Nová Ves, Liberec, ahead of the ANO movement.
The association of independent candidates received 59.88 per cent of the vote and won four of the seven seats in the municipal council.
ANO received 40.12 percent of the votes and strengthened against the regular elections in 2018, gained one more mandate and now has three.
Turnout was 42.9 per cent of voters.
On Monday, the State Election Commission will discuss the election results.
They will then be published in the Collection of Laws.
What do you think is the bigger problem?
A dead civilian or a foreign politician?
I think you know all of this stuff that people are writing to you.
You're just pretending to be stupid so you have someone to "argue" with.
If not, it's sad.
I am not saying that Christians are degenerates, or anything like that.
I even like a lot of church buildings aesthetically (which was of course the point, to look good).
And I don't care who believes what.
On the other hand, I don't like how much power the church had in the Middle Ages, how much money it hoarded, the suppression of science, etc.
Not to mention all the wars it has caused, such as the Thirty Years' War
Tl;dr: Believe in the spaghetti monster all you like, but the state and the church have nothing to do with each other
The man fell head first from 12 meters.
He survived the impact with the concrete.
An incredible fall was survived by a man in Ostrava on Sunday night, who was attended to by paramedics from the Regional Health Emergency Service.
The regional emergency operations center received a 911 call an hour after midnight on Saturday with initial information about a man falling from a height.
Two ZZS crews – medical and paramedic – were immediately sent to the scene.
On arrival at the scene, paramedics discovered that the 27-year-old man had fallen from a window at a height of around twelve metres and landed on his head on the concrete!
In Vítkovice, it caught the coal.
But not as it should have been, and the firefighters were called in.
On the arrival of the emergency services, the man was unconscious, with multiple injuries and in a life-threatening condition.
The attending physician intubated his airways, provided artificial lung ventilation, and after further measures in the pre-hospital emergency care, the ambulance transported him to further care at the Ostrava Trauma Centre, informed the spokesperson for the Moravian-Silesian Region's Emergency Medical Service, Lukáš Humpl.
I'm more worried about the public's and government's inadequate response to coronavirus than I am about the virus itself
The spread of the coronavirus in the Czech Republic is a challenge for politicians and officials, but doctors and medical staff are on the front line of the fight against the disease.
How serious is the situation from their point of view?
We are asking the military doctor David Řezáč.
Editor: Matěj Válek, Research: Tomáš Roček, Sound: David Kaiser, Music: Martin Hůla
Legendary Nunes fell after 7 years, Oliveira defended the belt
MMA had a great gala evening full of interesting results.
Things happened at UFC 269.
The underdog Julianna Peña was able to defeat the legendary wrestler Amanda Nunes, who hadn't been defeated for seven years.
In the lightweight division, Charles Oliveira didn't hesitate, submitted Dustin Poirier with a great choke and defended the belt.
Also winning was Kai Kara-France, who quickly swept Cody Garbrandt with a technical knockout in the first round.
He also defeated his opponent, Sean O'Malley.
It was a surprise that no one was expecting.
This was brought by the women's bantamweight bout between the famous Amanda Nunes and Julianna Pena.
The American entered the bout as a sort of "underdog," as Nunes had not lost in seven years and was looking to notch another victory.
The beginning of the duel was also in the spirit of paper assumptions.
Nunes started the fight very actively and even delivered a push kick to her opponent, which sent her to the ground.
But Pena was not to be deterred from making any more mistakes, and she herself unsuccessfully tried to attack with a hand lever.
The second round was gripping and very tense for the MMA fans.
Both opponents traded a lot of good punches and hard hooks.
Penna then threw Nunes to the ground, where she began to strangle her.
She had to abandon her efforts and fend off the attack.
The American caused a huge shock when she became the new champion.
The main event was the fight between Charles Oliveira and Dustin Poirier for the lightweight title.
At first, Poirier was doing better, but the cards started to turn.
In the second, Oliveira was trying to be more active, trying to take down his opponent with an arm lock.
He didn't do very well, but then he built up a lot of pressure and got his opponent on his back, and rained down a series of blows on him.
This allowed him to win the second round.
In the third round, Oliveira showed a rear naked choke, which Poirier resisted for a while, but then had to tap out.
The Brazilian defended his title, while Poirier lost after two years.
In the next bout, Sean O'Malley scored a decisive victory, landing a hard right hand on Raulian Paiva in the first round.
He then knocked him down with a series of well-aimed blows to record his 15th triumph.
Kara-France then beat Cody Garbrandt.
In the spring, Nunes celebrated another triumph with her little daughter, now, after seven years, she has lost.
That hip or this hip?
At first glance, it's not complicated.
Most nouns in Czech express only one grammatical gender, so there is no problem in determining whether it is masculine, feminine, or neuter.
There is, however, also a relatively large group of nouns whose gender is not fixed.
Such substantives vacillate between two genders.
When inflected, they take on double endings, and in some cases, remain in the uninflected form.
For example, the words "svížel" and "kyčel" are both of the masculine and feminine gender, in the first one it is declined according to the model "stroj", in the second one according to the model "píseň".
In another group of nouns, the forms are different even in the first case singular, for example: "řádek/řádka", "kedluben/kedlubna" or "brambor/brambora" (in the sense of food).
Both forms are standard, have the same meaning, and are thus freely interchangeable.
Some words can vary regionally, for example, "okurka" in Bohemia and "okurek" in Moravia, but in this case, the Moravian variant is incorrect, as is the case with other Czech-Moravian pairs of words: "příkop" and "příkopa", "kobliha" and "koblih", and so on.
Some words that have entered the Czech language from other languages were originally uninflected, but they are now gradually taking on Czech endings.
A typical example is the word "image", which is both masculine and feminine, or the word "buffet", which remains in the middle gender and is not declined in the masculine, but has endings like "castle".
Turkey has opened the way for migrants to Europe.
What does the situation look like on the Greek border?
There is tension on the Greek-Turkish border as the number of migrants trying to make their way to Europe increases.
Thousands of people started to move towards the southern border of the Schengen area after Ankara stopped preventing them.
European politicians are promising Greece support, and the Czech government is also preparing humanitarian aid.
What motivates refugees to take such a perilous journey?
And what's the situation on the ground like?
We haven't seen a blue sky for three months and we're suffocating, says Sydney journalist
Australia's devastating fires, now in their fourth month, have killed almost three dozen people and hundreds of millions of animals and destroyed millions of hectares of land.
How are the local authorities and the residents themselves dealing with the disaster?
Could the Prime Minister's government have done more to avert the dramatic impact, critics argue?
And what will the country have to prepare for in relation to climate change in the future?
Lenka Kabrhelová speaks to journalist Ika Detrichová from Sydney.
False accusations have always been and are quite rare.
That's why everyone is written about everywhere.
It's uncomfortable for people to think about sexual violence in our society and how pervasive it is, so they try to ignore it.
I don't personally know anyone who's been falsely accused.
But I know a lot of people who have been raped, and I've seen how their surroundings or even the police often treat those people.
Victims should always be believed.
It has become a trend for victims to finally open up about their traumas.
However, many people still keep it to themselves.
Yes, there are those who make false accusations.
It's disgusting and spitting in the face of every victim of sexual assault, but by spreading the idea that "a lot of the allegations are false" and that it's a "trend" you're only helping sexual predators.
Scattered houses flood the Czech Republic, families have no money to complete them
The price of building materials has increased by more than 30 per cent in recent weeks and months.
It has put a lot of people in a difficult situation.
He does not have the means to finish the family homes he has laid out and the banks are refusing to increase his mortgage.
In addition to the cost of materials, the cost of construction work is increasing.
People therefore do not have enough money to complete the family homes that have already been laid out.
In many cases, banks are refusing to increase mortgage loans, which creates an extremely unpleasant situation.
At best, people are moving into houses that are scattered and not finished.
In the worst case, the houses are empty and families are forced to sell them because they cannot afford to pay off the mortgage and rent at the same time," says BHS economist Štěpán Křeček.
We build two to three family houses a year and for fifty percent of them, this has happened.
It's hard for us as a construction company, because we have to honour some things contractually, even though the materials have gone up in price.
So we do it for free," said construction company owner Zdeněk Slivoň.
A lot of people are going to have financial problems.
If they were counting on the house costing five million, now it will cost seven.
I think some will wait and see," Slivoň added.
The most expensive materials were copper, iron and also plumbing and heating equipment.
Construction firms are also struggling with a lack of labour.
The Czech Republic is short of construction graduates and the influx of foreign workers has been hindered by the pandemic.
At this moment, the situation is only more favourable in terms of issuing building permits.
"In October, building authorities issued 7,675 building permits, which is almost 10 percent more than a year ago," said Křeček.
We're doing well and we'll do even better.
There is a lack of real vision, says ČRO – MujRozhlas commentator
In addition to the traditional celebrations, the start of the new year is traditionally accompanied by the speeches of politicians.
This year, in addition to the Prime Minister and ANO leader Andrej Babiš, and President Miloš Zeman's Christmas message, the leaders of the Senate and the Chamber of Deputies spoke to the nation.
What did we learn?
It seems to me that the master's thesis is great, I have my own topic that I have chosen, I am building on the bachelor's thesis, I always work on it for a whole year and then I write the written part in a week or two.
The state police are quite calm here, unless you're a total makak and something is left in your head, then the commission won't unnecessarily suffocate you with a theory.
I, for example, studied for the state exam for a week, and when I was stuck, the commission always tried to lead me to some kind of logical conclusion, which I immediately understood, and I was right.
Otherwise to those projects, I know people who pay someone to do their semester project for them (we did it a lot, it's really beneficial, you learn a lot) and then they just learn the project and they're done.
I think it's great when there's an exam at the end of a subject, which reflects the knowledge gained during the project, not just a defence.
All well and good, but don't inundate us with emails and phone calls and don't send any packages to the embassy.
You'll be just like them.
Those people at the embassy may have nothing to do with it.
And if they were against Russia, they would be taking a big risk, so maybe they have to play with them, because otherwise something could happen to them.
But you can easily put a similar statue of Putin next to the Pú statue.
Even if it's just to give it to Xi Jinping, or something like that.
I agree, despite the fact that Insta is kicking artists under the table.
If you don't post stories daily and a new picture at least every other day, your reach will drop to a bare minimum.
Plus, it keeps changing what's more important, whether it's a like, a comment or a save.
I've been very frustrated lately, so maybe I'll have to go down to TikTok, where a lot of the artists in my field are having success and they don't give a fuck.
In the end, I might even welcome something a little more user-friendly that doesn't suck all the creativity and energy out of artists
Declaration of the Workers' Party of Donbass
To the union - yes, to the break-up - no, say the opponents of the break-up of the USSR in the picture.
Thirty years since the illegal dissolution of the USSR.
On December 8, 1991, the largest geopolitical catastrophe in the history of mankind took place.
On December 8, 1991, Boris Yeltsin, Leonid Kravchuk, and Stanislav Shushkevich, without any legal authority and in violation of the results of the March 17, 1991 referendum, with an open conciliatory attitude towards Mikhail S. Gorbachev, secretly, without regard for the people, signed an agreement that "the USSR as a subject of international law and as a geopolitical reality ceases to exist".
With one stroke of a pen, they "eliminated" a huge country with almost 300 million people.
With the collapse of the USSR, tens of millions of ethnic Russian citizens found themselves living abroad.
Since the early 1990s, Russia's population has decreased by ten to eleven million.
Even without the loss of the non-Russian population of the former Soviet republics, we have already lost more people than in both World Wars combined!
Even earlier, the same people who, in one session in the Belovezhskaya Pushcha forest, destroyed what had been built over the previous seventy years, betrayed the socialist camp (created at the cost of millions of lives in the Second World War and the Great Patriotic War).
They deliberately de-industrialised, stifled agriculture, and pulled the plug on the world's largest superpower, the 14 republics that had been economically integrated into a single mechanism.
If we want to go even deeper, we see the impoverishment of the population, the collapse of the economy, science, the army, the growth of crime, inter-ethnic conflicts, the war in Chechnya, all the conflicts in the post-Soviet space, a series of orange revolutions, the expansion of NATO to the east, the war and the breakup of Yugoslavia, the Arab Spring, the war in Syria - all of this is the result of a geopolitical capitulation, first of the socialist camp, and then of the Soviet Union.
There is a concept in political science known as "power vacuum."
All that was in a hurry betrayed and given away was quickly filled and taken over by the NATO countries that accepted our geopolitical capitulation.
And the whole world is still shaken by the events of the late 1980s and early 1990s.
The price of a product in a supermarket with high turnover does not necessarily correspond to its quality and quality.
It's Monday and we have some meat in the supermarket for 189 CZK/kg.
I'll buy it, put it in the fridge, and make it for dinner on Thursday.
In an alternative reality, in which I don't buy meat on Monday, the chain will reduce it to 99 CZK/kg on Tuesday - describe to me the mechanism by which the meat, by changing its price, becomes a burden on my digestive system?
Or should I wait until Thursday and the meat will be discounted to CZK 69/kg - how would this meat differ from that which I bought on Monday for CZK 120 and left it in my fridge for 3 days?
I'll answer that myself - with nothing.
This crap about the fact that if something is cheap, it must be definitely bad, spoiled or of poor quality is really retarded, to tell you the truth ;-)
Recently, I went to Hlavas in Brno and in the underpass a lady was handing out some kind of brochure, I always take such things to help the brigadiers, they can't throw it away...
No, the brochure was full of common sense and conservative views on how the world works, but there was nothing about God, I was confused, but I suspected it would be some kind of agitprop.
After reading it, I found out who published it, and it turned out to be Scientology.
No, it was a good matron, full of completely useless advice, like that I should wash and not be a bitch.
A waste of paper, this forest would not need to be cut down for it.
I've experienced something similar with an ex-girlfriend.
Psychological manipulation and emotional blackmail will force you to comply with that person because you love them, without realizing how much of a mess the situation is.
She threatened me several times to hurt me because I went out to chat with a friend she didn't like.
Or the time I wanted to leave her apartment early and she broke down in tears, begging me on her knees not to leave.
She then began to physically block the door.
It was a great relationship for about a year, but then another six months passed and it started to beat her up.
Afterwards, I ended the relationship with her by saying that I was breaking up with her, but that we could talk about it next week to calm her down, so that she wouldn't go on another rampage.
Such a person will suck the city, emotions and overall joy out of you.
It's best to keep your distance
When insurance companies are going crazy buying up clouds of tests and hunting for positives who wouldn't have even known about the terrible disease if it weren't for the test.
All we are doing is causing trouble for businesses, hauliers and others because their employees have been sentenced to five days of house arrest by a random number generator.
In the west, they stopped messing around with it and admitted that it's not worth dealing with a disease weaker than the famous flu.
Unfortunately, Válek is new and has to steal something and fuel his ego by making up bullshit.
I see that the old good smear is coming back to us.
After a few years of dormancy and suppression of this illegal business, MLM recruiting is back in the limelight.
I was one of the recruits, I tried it (I was 20 years old, a first-year student at university), the initial promises of training in products and business skills quickly turned into "it doesn't matter to you, just get people".
I was genuinely interested in the products I was offering, as I wanted to help people, but the training was more about how to scare and talk people into buying.
When the first money came in, you quickly realized that if you wanted to make money, you had to push a few certain products a month.
Investment life insurance and mortgages were the only things that paid, so you felt like a travelling pot salesman.
However, I can say that it was a valuable experience, and I learned not to jump on every piece of gossip and to check information thoroughly.
At the same time, I wouldn't put them all in one bag.
There are people in this business who are successful and even beneficial to people, but they certainly won't boast of expensive consumer goods or a "fat" account.
In the corporation where I work, I have not seen so many of these things.
HR is calm, the managers look after their management and they don't stick their nose into anything.
Regular assessment does happen, in the form that it happens here (set yourself some goals for next year, in a year's time we'll see what worked and what didn't) - it's more of a self-assessment than someone assessing you based on some numbers, and so on.
Company outings are also optional.
But we are a bit unique within our company - there are departments that are more "corporate".
There are times when you feel like we're some kind of quasi-startup, squatting in the offices of a big corporation.
But it doesn't bother us that much as long as the results are there.
A Czech woman missing in Britain is dead.
Her body was found in London.
British police have been searching for the missing 32-year-old Czech woman, who disappeared at the end of November, for almost ten days without success.
On Sunday, December 12, the former Minister of Foreign Affairs, Jakub Kulhánek, announced on social media that the woman from Uherské Hradiště had been found dead.
The British police unfortunately confirmed to our embassy in London this afternoon that they had found the body of the missing Czech citizen.
The cause of death is under investigation.
Given the family's wishes, we will not be releasing any further information on the case.
Sincere condolences, wrote Kulhánek on Twitter.
The young woman was last seen on November 28 on a bus on her way home from work. She had just withdrawn money from an ATM before boarding the bus.
Her co-workers reported her missing five days later.
Following this, the London police began to search for her, and she was added to Interpol's list of people wanted worldwide.
It also appeared in the Czech database of missing persons.
The police arrested one man in connection with the incident a few days ago.
She did not say what role he played in the case or what he was suspected of.
At the end of the year, four new town councils were elected
On Saturday 11 December, new representatives were elected in the villages of Komňa near Uherské Hradiště, Lužice near Most, Nová Ves near Liberec, and Rovná near Pelhřimov.
The number of councillors in these municipalities has fallen below the number required by law or the elected councils have disintegrated.
In the new elections, 99 valid candidates competed for the 28 seats.
Turnout was 62.41%.
The highest turnout was recorded in the village of Rovná, where 93.62% of eligible voters went to the polls.
In total, 8 women and 20 men were elected to the mandate.
The average age of the elected representatives is 46.7 years.
The oldest is 69 years old, the youngest 33 years old.
A total of 13 candidate lists were registered for the new elections to the council of the four municipalities.
36 women and 63 men competed for the 28 council seats.
The average age of candidates was 46.6 years.
The youngest candidate was 22, the oldest 72.
Processing the results of Saturday's election symbolically closes a fairly difficult, but successful year for us.
Four new or repeat elections to municipal councils and, above all, the very closely watched election to the Chamber of Deputies took place.
They had to work in more difficult epidemic conditions, which put greater demands on the equipment and staffing, assessed Eva Krumpová, the 1st Deputy Chairperson of the Czech Statistical Office.
The last polling district was counted at 03:49 on Sunday 12 December.
On Monday, the State Election Commission will discuss the results of the vote and, after approval, they will be published in the Collection of Laws.
This is the biggest problem I have with the whole pandemic.
It took me a little while to get used to the fact that we had a very dangerous infectious disease, but it went without any major problems.
I have a problem dealing with the fact that a large part of the population at all its levels is acting like idiots.
I am most looking forward to the vaccination (tomorrow!) because it will finally make me less dependent on other people not being assholes.
He would be removed from office and disqualified from ever holding it again.
However, as others have mentioned, the chances of this actually happening are pretty small.
In addition, I'm not sure that the photocopying of a file could even be considered as treason.
Treason is an act by which the president of the republic endangers the sovereignty, territorial integrity, or the democratic character of the state.
It had to be something more serious.
How the pandemic has affected your sex life: More people under 35 are having no sex at all for a year
More and more young adults in the U.S. are living their lives without sex.
They are mainly religious people, according to the DailyMail website.
The survey showed that from 2008 to 2021, the share of people under 35 who abstained from sex rose from eight to 21 percent.
Women aged 18 to 35 who say they haven't had sex in the past year are at an all-time high.
The decline in the number of sexually active individuals is also due to other factors, according to a survey by the Institute for Family Studies (IFS).
One of them could be the economic impact of the coronavirus pandemic and a higher percentage of unemployment.
However, the presence of the media, social networks and video games, which make sex less and less of a priority for young people, could also be a factor.
"Since 2010, there has been a rapid rise in the share of men and women aged 18-35 who say they had no sex in the past year," said IFS researcher Lyman Stone.
Married people are more likely to be sexually active, with just 5 per cent saying they had not had sex in the last year in 2021.
Among the unmarried, it was 29 percent. Mr. Stone added that marriages under 35 were only a small percentage.
The decrease in sexual activity is also caused by the fear of premarital sex and religious beliefs.
Despite being more likely to be sexually active, the proportion of married and cohabiting under-35s is still falling.
Young people's views on pre-marital sex are split, with about 30% seeing it as wrong and about 70% as acceptable.
"It's true that they're a minority among singles in this age group, but their behavior is shifting the trend," Stone says of the 30 percent.
For most of those who have a moral problem with premarital sex, the reason is a religious upbringing.
Among single people under 35 who attend religious services more than once a month, the proportion abstaining has risen from 20 per cent to almost 60 per cent since 2008.
The trend among the "less religious" has risen from 10 to 20 percent," Stone said.
Other factors, such as less social interaction and social drinking during the pandemic, also contributed to the decline in sexual activity.
The study also found that people who are unemployed or have lower incomes are less likely to be sexually active.
Another reason could be the expansion of digital media, which seems to reduce the need for sex.
People are spending more time online, which "substitutes" for this need.
This trend has taken hold mainly during the lockdown in the time of the coronavirus pandemic.
The whole COVID vaccine mandate is about whether or not society should force a portion of the population to do something they don't want to do, but that could save their lives.
It's a pretty heavy question, and the one I'm personally most interested in is the question of social conscience.
That is to say, for example, the question of whether if we don't tell them and they die, it will be our fault.
My argument is that we could certainly have prevented the death of an 80-year-old who really didn't know much, we didn't explain it well to him, he heard some misinformation, and as a result he didn't get vaccinated and ended up catching it and dying.
On the other hand, I do not think that we can blame the death of a determined opponent of vaccination, who has been ranting about bullying and a totalitarian state alongside the SPD and the KSČ.
From the statistics I mentioned, it is quite clear that the majority of the unvaccinated pensioners probably belong to the second group, so they will actually have to pay for it themselves.
Snowless Czechia.
How will the mild winter affect the drought?
This year's winter has brought one of the smallest snowfalls in recent times in the Czech Republic.
Ski resorts cannot do without technical snow, and the weather also complicates the preparation of the cross-country Jizerská Padesátka.
Is this a trend, or an exception?
And what does little snow mean for the fight against drought in the Czech Republic?
I do have one story, but it's not about the plate-licker.
Once in middle school, our teacher took us across town to a boathouse so we could take boats out on the river.
On the way there we walked down a fairly wide street and in the middle of it we saw a Hare Krishna devotee.
Of course, they came down on us.
I was lucky enough to escape, but one of my friends talked to him.
When she left us, we asked her and the teacher what she said to them.
"They asked me if I wanted to save my soul.
I told them that I don't have a soul," she replied.
All of us, including the teacher, laughed all the way to the boatyard.
We're very spoilt.
Not much is happening, but the system is collapsing, says Orozovič
New German chancellor Olaf Scholz arrived in Warsaw on Sunday after previous visits to Paris and Brussels, where he was greeted with military honors by Prime Minister Mateusz Morawiecki.
"We are opening a new chapter in our relations," Morawiecki said at a joint press conference after the meeting.
Scholz stressed that Europe must make it clear together that it will not accept the violation of the territorial integrity of Ukraine.
The crisis triggered by the disturbing movements of Russian troops on the Ukrainian border is, according to the chancellor, to be dealt with by means of diplomatic negotiations, including as part of the "Normandy group," which brings together France, Germany, Russia and Ukraine.
Morawiecki said he informed the chancellor of the situation on Poland's border with Belarus, whose leader Alexander Lukashenko has artificially created a migration crisis and is using people as human shields and a weapon, because night after night we are recording hundreds of attempts to (illegally) cross the border.
I discussed further sanctions with the Chancellor to make it clear to the Lukashenko regime and its patrons in the Kremlin that we are determined to defend the EU's eastern frontier.
According to DPA, Scholz assured that Warsaw enjoys German support in its dispute with Belarus and condemned Lukashenko's regime's inhumane treatment of refugees.
Drunken Polish nun caused accident, tried to cover it up
After a while, the car returned to the scene of the accident, but it was being driven by another nun who was trying to take the blame.
When police officers told her that she could still lose her driver's licence for not giving way and leaving the scene of the accident, she admitted the truth, TVN24 reported.
She admitted that she collided with another nun who asked her for help.
Then the police came for Celestina's sister.
She was breathalysed and her licence was immediately revoked after it was discovered she had more than two-and-a-half times the legal limit of alcohol in her system.
At the same time, they informed her that she would be questioned about her actions in court.
The dog, Hugo, is doing his best.
However, Juraj Šajmovič did not keep an eye on his film.
Czech creators of family comedies have been inspired by American stories about pampered dogs.
But they forgot one important thing: the laws of film-making.
After F. Brabce's cheesy film, Gump - the dog who taught people to live, another film, Here We Watch Over You, is now vying for the audience's emotions in cinemas.
Co-screenwriter and director in one person, Juraj Šajmovič Jr. follows up on his previous film Tady hlídám já from 2012.
The talking hedgehog Hugo is returning to the stage, along with some familiar characters.
Julie and Ivan, owners of a dying Šumava guest house, start inviting dog walkers, Julie's father with his partner and especially her daughter Veronika.
She is no longer a little girl, but a young woman experiencing her first love.
The director and his partner, Beatriz Šajmovičová (who is also the film's producer), struggled with the storytelling in their previous canine film, but at least the children and the dog had fun there.
This time, the creative duo have written an even weaker script that elicits a mixture of fear and feelings of embarrassment.
Let's recap.
Julie, despite being a scientist, succumbs to the darkness of her desire for a child and when the right "constellation" occurs, she copulates with her forest engineer Ivan anywhere the coordinates indicate - on the hood of a car or a church tower (of course during an ongoing tour with a local guide), the retired colonel Mojmír, despite years of training, shoots his own daughter (Julie) in the forest, who falls into a coma, after which she is taken from the hospital by the family so that the miraculous process of healing by dogs can take place in the heart of a Bohemian wilderness.
Nothing wrong with a bit of nature therapy and the power of a pet animal's love.
Their owners know why they have them.
But the viewer can't help but wonder how much content pelmel full of implausible situations and figures was needed for this message.
A pair of staff thieves, a dog show, a South Bohemian charlatan, police officers arriving to search for "drugs" and discussing the fertilising power of bone meal over herbs - and, of course, the baked family in the pension getting drunk.
When the protagonist, after a long coma, wakes up and immediately sits at the family table, half-naked and made-up, with a cigarette in her hand, and demands her father's whisky and a bit of gossip, as if she were a recovered vegetarian, you can't help but laugh.
On top of that, the creators explain to the viewer that "this sometimes happens after a coma."
Šajmovič's team lacks the basic dramaturgical knowledge of working with text, the ability to build up the main situations, a sense for the characters and the point, and directorial guidance.
The acting is uneven, the editing aimless and the overall impression muddled.
As much as Lukáš Vaculík, Jitka Ježková or Nela Boudová try to keep their parties going, they don't have much to play with.
The only positive aspect of the film are the poetic shots of the Šumava nature by cameraman Vladimír Holomek and the pair of ferrets.
It is not enough to outline a few characters, a flimsy plot, and dog jokes, not to mention the more common vulgar expressions that the characters use.
It is not even a long-standing membership in the Dachshund Breeder's Club, as in the case of the lady producer.
Behind the good intentions to promote nature and the friendship between man and dog, there must also be knowledge of the craft, if one wants to tell a credible story.
This was not the case this time.
There's a bit too much erotica and not enough feeling for the genre in a good family photo.
Even as an advertisement for canine therapy, this amateurish piece wouldn't pass muster.
Yes, respect, because they have to listen to constant insults from idiots like you.
There's a difference between offering and forcing, here you can see how you don't understand shit, but that's only because you've never tried it.
The decision is always up to the customer. If they don't want it, the answer will always be no.
If you listened to a kid like that all the time, you might change your mind.
It's a job just like any other, in this case a side hustle.
The Middle East is experiencing unusually dry months.
Winter is the only time of the year when it rains.
"The almost complete absence of rainfall during November, as recorded at some stations, is unusual," confirms the Israel Meteorological Service.
For example, the village of Kfar Giladi in northern Israel reports only six percent of its long-term average rainfall for November.
This week's two-day rain was therefore more of an exception.
It's good for us.
It hadn't rained for a long time.
It's also the right Christmas backdrop, rejoiced Nazareth resident Wasim Aškar.
Rainfall in Israel comes almost exclusively in the winter months, is sporadic and unpredictable.
Forests depend on winter rains.
Without them, they dry out and become prone to fires.
It's not just about forests, but also drinking water supplies and irrigation for farmers.
Israel's largest freshwater source, the Sea of Galilee, is this spring full to the brim after three consecutive rainy winters.
Since then the level has been falling.
The water authorities have been warning of a drought for a long time.
"It is expected that, due to global warming and climate change, there will be less rainfall here," Uri Schor, a spokesperson for the Israel Water Authority, said in 2018.
Israel can help with technologies such as desalination and waste-water recycling.
Economically weaker countries such as Lebanon, Syria and Jordan are worse off.
In the streets of Jordan's capital, Amman, there are more tanker trucks.
Water mains and private wells are drying up.
"This year, my orders have gone up by 70 to 80 percent compared to the previous two years," tanker driver Imad Suleiman said in September.
In Iran's Isfahan, clashes broke out between farmers and security forces.
The cause of the protests was the drought.
The bed of the local river was completely dry.
The region has experienced its driest November in many recent years.
Israel preparing military strike against Iran
Israel's defense minister said the Vienna talks had produced "no progress" and that he had informed Washington of preparations for an attack on Iran's nuclear facilities.
Minister Benny Gantz stated on Saturday that he had ordered the Israeli army to prepare for a possible military strike against Iran, reports Jonathan Lis.
Gantz, who is in the United States, is trying to convince Americans to increase pressure on Iran, but he is also informing Washington about military preparations.
During a press conference in Florida, Gantz said the nuclear talks in Vienna have not brought "any progress" and the world powers "understand that the Iranians are playing with them."
This happened to me about three years ago.
I flirted a bit with the girl and grilled her during conversation to find out what she wanted from me.
I eventually discovered that my suspicions of a pyramid scheme were well-founded.
Because I really don't like these tricks, I asked the lady a few more questions and then thanked her and left.
Feel free to call me a scoundrel, but a pyramid is a pyramid and a financial advisor is a financial advisor.
Skiers headed for the mountains over the weekend, where there was plenty of snow and good weather
The ski resorts in the Czech Republic have experienced the first major influx of skiers this weekend.
After the heavy snowfall at the end of the working week, there is no shortage of snow and some ski resorts have opened.
The skiers were not deterred by the requirement to show a Covid certificate at the lifts.
While tow operators are not complaining about a lack of customers, some ski equipment rentals are reporting weaker demand for their services than before the epidemic.
Thousands of people in the Liberec Region hit the cross-country ski trails and ski slopes over the weekend.
The weather was friendly to skiers today, which offered both sunshine and excellent snow conditions.
"We are satisfied; the opening weekend really started on Friday evening, when we had the first skiers on the hill," said Jakub Hanuš, the director of the Ještěd Sports Area, in praise of the interest.
Hundreds of people headed to the Jeseníky Mountains for the first weekend of skiing in the new season.
For example, Ski Arena Karlov and the centre in Branná near Šumperk were open.
Weekend attendance was very good, with approximately 400 people on Saturday and today.
The conditions are great.
Today the sun was shining and it was about minus three degrees, so perfect, said Rostislav Procházka, the representative of the ski resort in Branná.
Ski resort operators can only sell lift tickets to people who are vaccinated or have recently had COVID-19.
With the exception of a few, people are prepared for this and they show the necessary documents, said René Hroneš from the Špindlerův Mlýn ski centre to ČTK.
"We've only had a handful of incidents," he added.
Some rental and ski-equipment shops are reporting less business than before the pandemic.
Fortunately, there is interest in renting skis.
It's not like in previous years, but there are still enough customers, said Alexandra Bokišová from the Opava branch of Skiopava.
The biggest influx is expected during the ski courses.
David Šinták, the manager of the Snowbear company in Hradec Králové, also feels that interest in renting ski equipment has decreased due to COVID-19.
By the time of the pandemic, we were already on loan.
Compared to the period before the pandemic, we are at about 50 per cent, Šinták told CTK.
According to him, people have become lethargic during the pandemic and have learned to sit at home.
In contrast, there is a lot of demand at the Novako rental in Boží Dar.
They started renting skis a week ago, and those interested have to order them in advance.
"We are starting to rent skis this weekend, but people have already called in advance, so we expect a lot of interest, just like last year," said the facility operator, Pavlína Nováková.
According to her, the interest in the ski school is also comparable to the period before the epidemic.
If we want successful and wealthy people to stay in the Czech Republic, they must have the opportunity to live a good life here as they do abroad.
Socialist health care, where it is often difficult to find a dentist or a specialist doctor, is definitely not included.
The smart and clever people who have no property here are leaving the country.
The owner of a business doesn't just up and leave for a foreign country.
I agree with the rest, though.
If these people don't live well in the Czech Republic and if these people don't see a reasonable future in the Czech Republic, then they simply won't live in the Czech Republic.
Emigration from Hungary began when one day Orbán won, ruled for a year, and all of a sudden the annual emigration rose by a few tens of thousands.
It is naive to think that the Czech Republic cannot find itself in a similar position from one day to the next.
Another question is the elections at all.
When things are going badly, it is also possible for a traditional V4 madman to win here.
The young and educated leave, leaving behind his base of support and people whose assets don't fit in a plane.
Frightening photo!
Langmajer in the blood over a beer bet?
While autumn was in full swing in the Czech Republic, the cast and crew of the film Island, led by Jiří Langmajer (55), were enjoying the tropical weather in Thailand!
The actor posted a bloody photo of his face on social media.
Is it a real injury, or is it make-up for filming?
London police are still looking for the missing Czech woman.
She was last seen on her way home.
"Her disappearance is completely out of character and we are growing increasingly concerned for her welfare," said Lucy O'Connor of the Lambeth police station, where Srncova worked, in a Saturday video.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried about her and just wants to know where she is," she continued.
According to her, the missing Czech woman left work around 7:45 p.m. on Sunday, 28 November, and headed home to the Camberwell district.
She was last seen getting on a bus about half an hour later.
She was reported missing on Dec. 3 by one of her co-workers.
According to British media, Srncová worked as a "nursing assistant" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are deeply concerned about our dear colleague Petra who is missing," the group of healthcare facilities said in a Twitter post.
"We would ask anyone who may have any information which could assist in finding her to contact the police," the statement continued.
MP Harriet Harman, who drew attention to the case of the Doe on Saturday at a press conference, also urged the public to cooperate.
"She's been missing for a few days, she's only 32 years old, she's from the Czech Republic, her parents are obviously distraught," said the Labour politician, holding up a photograph of the woman distributed by London police.
"I feel like we all have a particular responsibility to try and find her, because she was away from her home country, away from her family and working here for our health service," Ms Harman said.
A man has previously been arrested in connection with the case and remains in custody.
The BBC reports, however, that police have not released any information about the man's identity or what he is suspected of.
Russia is not capable of occupying Ukraine, and certainly not with 30 BTG (about 5 divisions).
I do not underestimate Ukraine either.
That's not a "massive amount," but about 8 percent of the Russian army.
Note that Ukraine is constantly repeating that we are exaggerating the threat of invasion, and is starting to get fed up with our presence.
I quoted above.
I don't know where he got the idea that Russia wants war.
War is a costly joke and Russia has the GDP of Italy.
The comparison with the situation in 38 is out of place in so many points that I don't even know where to start.
This can already be compared with the First Punic War and the "annexation" of Sicily :D
I can imagine that after Ukraine announced that it would not adhere to the Minsk agreements, Russia would annex the ridiculous republics.
That's all there is to it, and that is what the "concentration" at the borders would correspond to.
Yes, pacta sunt servanda...
New timetables come into force in Prague on Sunday, mainly affecting commuter services
Passengers in Prague's integrated transport system (PID) can expect a number of changes from Sunday, mainly concerning suburban services.
New lines have been created, some have changed their routes, and others have ceased to exist.
Mladoboleslavsko is now joining the integrated system.
Since Sunday, the express trains from České Budějovice have stopped in Zahradní Město station in the capital.
The S7 suburban trains will run on the route from Beroun to Český Brod, passing through the Prague main station.
The recently opened station in Prague-Zahradní Město will now be served by the R17 express train from České Budějovice and Benešov.
The PID will be extended to other areas.
In addition, there will be buses to Světlá nad Sázavou, Blatná near Jesenice, Staré Splavy and Turnov.
Buses in the Mladá Boleslav region will be included, including lines with transfers to the Liberec and Hradec Králové regions.
In the course of the integration, 77 lines will be abolished, 37 new lines will be introduced and the operation of 12 existing lines will be adjusted.
A new bus line 405 will run from Prague's Zličín to Žatec.
A new direct connection between Prague and Kralovice near Rakovník has also been created, replacing the cancelled S53 train line.
The services from Prague to Rakovník will be strengthened in the morning rush hour and at the weekend, when the new express line number 404 will run.
The new lines included in the PID system are 400 and 410, which travel to the Liberec region.
They leave from the Střížkov metro station, not from the Holešovice railway station.
Bus line 400 runs through Mělník, Dubá and Česká Lípa to Nový Bor, and selected connections continue to Rumburk or Cvikov.
The supplementary line 410 runs via Mělník and Dubá to Doksy, Mimoň and Jablonné v Podještědí.
In contrast, the operation of dozens of local lines in central Bohemia has been cancelled or reduced, including to Mochov, Dobříš and Rožmitál pod Třemšínem.
All trains departing from Prague at 02:30 have been cancelled.
The long-term restrictions on the lines Prague – Beroun, Prague – Lysá nad Labem and in the vicinity of Kolín will continue due to the modernisation of the railway.
Travellers can expect changes at other places as well.
Buses are replacing some of the cancelled train lines or the section of the 420 line from Dobříš with a connection from Prague, where it is possible to use PID tickets all the way to Milevsko.
The routes of lines 540 to 543 in Nymbursko have been changed, and the routes of some buses on the border between Central Bohemia and Hořovicko in the Pilsen region have been adjusted.
Healthy snack/lunch for the office from the supermarket
Hi, I work 9-5 with a 30min break and my only option to get food is to go next door to B&M or down the road to Lidl.
Because I don't have any movement, after work, I don't have the energy to exercise, so I have to eat as healthily and on a diet as possible.
Unfortunately, I never know what to buy and in a hurry, I buy, at most, a pizza roll, and for a snack, yogurt and an apple.
Question: What healthy food would you recommend I buy in the supermarket that does not need to be cooked?
Not everyone is waiting for one metre of snow like you are, unfortunately.
And it's not just trees that you have to see.
Under the snow, only the tip of the Christmas tree can be hidden.
If injured, the tree may be more susceptible to fungal diseases.
I'm not saying it's the only reason they don't allow us to go off-piste, but it's one of them.
Dara's admission about her relationship with Ned: I wasn't looking forward to this at all
The Czech show business pond has been alive with nothing but the revelation of the relationship between Dara Rolins and Pavel Nedved since Friday.
They have been together since the summer, and the famous footballer even divorced his wife for the singer.
Dara has now sent a lengthy message to her fans, explaining why she kept her love life a secret from them for six months.
"I dare to say that currently, there is no one in the Czech Republic or Slovakia who does not know that Dara caught a bear, i.e. pardon, Nedvěd," jokes Dara Rolins, who is in love with the most successful Czech footballer up to her ears.
It was he who packed her, not the other way around.
The three days are in the spotlight, and although they are used to public attention, they do not enjoy it.
And here it is.
What we were both dreading, but knew was inevitable, continued the singer.
I just don't know who has it worse.
Whether it's those who don't care at all and it jumps out at them from a can, or us, whose lives they pick apart in minute detail.
It's as if you wanted to hear everyone's opinion on whether or not you fit with your spouse or significant other, or if you insisted that everyone really knew the details of your past partners and were familiar with a list of your faults and mistakes.
That's a żużlo, you want it, Dara doesn't like it.
The pair got together in Italy, where Rolins went to prepare for her new fashion collection.
Nedvěd has been vice president of the Juventus football club for a long time.
They have only come out with the truth now, because they were waiting for the conclusion of Nedved's divorce.
He has been separated from his wife, Ivana, for three years, and they have only been officially divorced for three weeks.
Nevertheless, thank you to those who rejoice with us and wish us well.
We are just people, we have families, children, pasts and dreams.
We're not perfect, but I think we both have our hearts in the right place.
That is why I love my new man and just like him, I stand by him. For better or worse, concluded Rolins.
Hey, the other commenters have probably said everything there is to say, but I just wanted to confirm that the dorms are great for the beginning, my classmates mostly got to know each other and became friends during the first semester or two, and then found shared accommodation together, which I think is the best option because you know who you'll be living with.
Apartments are usually not advertised very far in advance, so you probably won't find much now, but it won't hurt to have a look at the offers.
Otherwise, definitely avoid not only Cejl, but also the surrounding areas (streets like Vranovská, Francouzská, etc., that's quite a bad address), and some parts of Židenice are a bit of a ghetto.
On the other hand, the Veveří district is very student-like, Královo Pole and in that direction is nice, apart from that it's close to most of the VUT faculties (I don't know where you're starting).
I've never looked for a place to rent, but I'm a native Brňák, so I can advise you on Brno as such, if you need any more information :)
This is an example of "normal" reasoning to me.
It is actually all right that the state does not sufficiently fund some schools because of what a few doctors decided to do somewhere in Poland.
Either they learn what they want and pay for it themselves, or they go according to the state and the state pays.
We cannot allow a private actor to take control of part of the education system just because he adds a few crowns to the full-fledged state contribution and can then teach what he wants in the schools.
Such a statement loses some of its weight when it is written by someone who two days ago wrote this about a petition calling for a boycott of a totalitarian state:
So a vote against someone going for an abortion is the same as a vote against a statue standing in a square?
If I were you, I would consult directly with the person who gave you the job.
Otherwise, I've experienced during cataloging/digitization that (even long-time professionals) either just guess or write something like xxx *** or ... (depending on the convention) and add a note that it's illegible.
The truth is, in this case, it's pretty readable, so I wouldn't really recommend it.
I'd personally deal with it in a comment depending on which program you're using.
If you want to be a good and diligent student, you can look up some trademark databases and find the nearest one.
But since it looks like you're drawing from a book, I would guess that the author or publisher simply created their own symbol that fits with what is physically on the coin.
PS: It's not a coincidence that it's rather the Kingdom of the Odrysai than the Kingdom of the Odrysans?
PSS: someone has already cracked it here.
Check out the comment with ΦΙΛH
Politicians don't even know what will be "the theme" of our presidency.
This is a much bigger mess than having interpreters with them.
The idea that they would approve something because no one understood some text is laughable.
All important approved documents are examined word by word, and basic knowledge of English is not enough for this; this is a job for lawyers.
Hundreds of translators and interpreters work in the various EU institutions, and English is more suited to politicians for informal contact and the establishment of non-standard relationships.
And with the English, it's quite interesting, after GB's exit from the EU.
I don't understand the hate for Ceylon.
I've been working there for three years now and I'm doing just fine.
I often come home from work at 10pm and have never had a problem.
Only someone who has hardly ever set foot in the area can say that it's a ghetto.
Yes, most of the Roma population of Brno live there, but all they do is block the sidewalk and park where they shouldn't. It's definitely not the case that I would be afraid to walk down the street there in the evening.
So if you're looking for relatively cheap accommodation with good access to the centre, I'd go for it.
There are a lot of newly reconstructed or newly built flats there now.
Felix Slováček (78) without Dáda and his mistress Gelemová as a fence post!
Who is she spending Christmas with?
On Sunday, most people lit the first candle on their advent wreath, Felix Slováček didn't.
I don't have an advent wreath, so there was nothing to light.
I saw the wreath and Lucie probably has one too, said the saxophonist to Blesk, confirming Patrasová's words that she often visits her.
He visits, but doesn't live in their home in Vinohrady, where Dáda was left alone after his departure.
Slovak still doesn't know where he will be on Christmas Eve.
We recently met up with Anička, Felix and both grandchildren.
VIDEO: Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
Felix Slováček and Lucie Gelemová: TOGETHER AGAIN!
But we were still talking, so Christmas didn't happen.
I really don't know where I'll be.
I buy presents all the time and I'm sure I'll get Dad and Lucy something, probably a perfume.
I'm a gentleman, added Felix, who came to the baptism of the music video in the Richman club on his own.
I'm here alone, but I don't feel alone.
I always find someone to have fun with, says Slováček, who was happy to meet Luděk Sobota's wife, Adriana, or singer Kamila Nývltová.
And he made that clear.
And we are Iceland, so we can afford not to have soldiers or weapons?
I doubt that anyone will defend us, and our location is so strategic that the aggressor would have to be a complete idiot not to occupy this territory.
And I don't understand why it should be a bad argument, can you explain that to me?
I don't know of any other component that could be deployed in a crisis in hospitals.
There are not enough police officers and they can't afford to, and the same is true of firefighters, and in no other place is there such a high percentage of medically trained people at such a high level.
And the fact that our army is capable of defending just Ostrava goes to the heads of previous governments, not the army, which has been asking for new toys for quite some time.
Record drought in the Czech Republic.
It is necessary to change agricultural subsidies; the countryside is not just a food factory, says the journalist.
The Czech Republic is experiencing the worst drought in recent years.
According to the scientists, there is less water in the mountain and foothill regions, and even places that have never been short of water are recording lower rainfall.
The cause of the drought in large parts of Central Europe is climate change.
However, the way we manage the soil is also making things worse.
What to prepare for in connection with the drought?
And how can we help nature in difficult times?
Yes, it will be like that, I can barely stay on my skates on the ice, I know what it is to play hockey, and the tactics (which I have tried in Franchise Hockey Manager) are also generally a load of nonsense.
And whether you are a "bear Russia" ice hockey team or a "lama China" team, losing by two goals when you do not have to win at all costs is different than when it is level.
But as it is, what I listen to the Czech commentators say, what the referees see or don't see, whether it's men's or women's hockey, it's all strange, but that is how it is with all sports, UEFA and "Italian actors" or motorsport F1, WRC, etc.
The controversy is everywhere.
And in my opinion, if it was the other way around, it would be the same as always, and since the Czech Republic has lost to Russia more often than it has won, it would probably be the classic "they lost" versus "we won".
Coronavirus: Russia's caseload exceeds 10 million
On Saturday, 11 December, the Czech Republic recorded 9080 daily cases.
5766 people are in hospital.
In total, 34,451 people died in the Czech Republic, another 74.
There are 1967 confirmed cases per 100 000 in the last 14 days, and 871 per 100 000 in the last week.
The number of infections in Russia passed 10 million on Sunday.
In the past 24 hours, 29,929 new cases were registered.
It is the lowest daily count since Oct. 13.
The total number of registered infections in Russia is 10,016,896.
The daily death toll is 1,132, the lowest daily death count since late October.
Britain is facing an "inevitable" large wave of infections caused by the Omicron variant, Dr Susan Hopkins, the chief medical adviser to the UK Health Security Agency, said on Sunday.
New quarantine measures will be required.
People infected with Omicron are already in hospital in the UK and Hopkins expects that number to rise.
So far, no one has died from omicron, but hospitalisations occur about 14 days after infection and deaths about three weeks after infection.
Labour leader Keir Starmer said on Sunday that Boris Johnson appeared to have broken the law by hosting a Christmas quiz at Downing Street in December last year, when a lockdown was in place and Christmas parties were banned.
One minister in Johnson's government argued that the quiz took place "virtually," through a computer.
However, it involved groups of staff gathered around computers in Downing Street.
There is growing pressure in Britain for Johnson to quit as prime minister.
During last December, when London was in a strict lockdown and Christmas parties were banned, Johnson's ministers held numerous parties despite the lockdown.
The British public and media are outraged that Johnson and his government have been laughing at them:
Paul Brand, ITV's commercial editor for the UK: Two years ago today Boris Johnson won a landslide victory in the general election.
The Conservative Party is talking this morning about removing him from the post of prime minister.
Remarkable how quickly events have unfolded.
Do you want to turn and save your skin?
Hungary is due to hold elections in the spring that could end Viktor Orban's 12-year rule.
They will be elections of European-wide significance.
How fair can you expect them to be?
They won't be fair.
They won't be free either, because the last two elections under Orbán weren't either.
His Fidesz party controls the media, redraws electoral districts to its advantage, and engages in other small and large tricks.
The most recent one sounds like everyone can choose where they want to vote in practice.
This will allow Fidesz to transport voters from decided districts to those where the outcome is uncertain and the opposition could win.
So, I'll just say that they won't be fair at all.
Do you think it will be as unfair as in 2014 and 2018?
After all, the situation is significantly different.
Before, it was not about whether Fidesz would win, but by how much and whether it would have a constitutional majority.
There is now a real chance that the united opposition will win more votes and seats.
This is unusual for Viktor Orbán and his party.
Will they try to hold on to power by playing even harder?
Yes, we have some indication that they're prepared to go beyond what they've done in the past.
Recently, a recording of the Speaker of Parliament and one of the leaders of the Fidesz party, László Kövér, was leaked to the independent media, in which he explains to the heads of the secret services that the opposition is a threat to national security.
Are those the hints of a new approach you are talking about?
Yes, that's one of the new things.
It all starts with the tongue.
I was hit quite often, last time when I was 14, my mother doesn't have much patience, neither do I, my father has had it for a long time, but then he hits me extremely hard (only in connection with me).
I am also very choleric and I used to get very angry as a child, to the extent that I would lie on the floor in a fit, turning blue, and they had to take me under the shower a couple of times to calm me down.
Sometimes they would reprimand me, sometimes it was more like they didn't know what to do with me.
I definitely have a tendency to solve things by force now as well. When I was little, I fought quite a bit. Now I at least hit something to release my anger. When I was younger, I might have slapped my parents across the hand, for example (so that I wouldn't get hit in the arm too much), so I've never done anything extreme, but I always have this urge.
I can't say to what extent this is due to my explosive nature, but the upbringing certainly has its part to play.
I'm afraid I'm going to lose my patience with my own children and deal with it the same way.
I think beating children is just wrong and my parents shouldn't have done it, especially not when it wasn't "educational", but out of frustration, on the other hand, I guess every parent just does something wrong, it's probably not possible to not mess up your kids at least a little bit, so I don't blame them.
It doesn't bother me, I don't understand why the OP should be ashamed of it.
Laws should be clear and unambiguous.
I would call Kundas those who make laws in such quality.
Otherwise, I would be interested to know if you are afraid of a loss of income?
Can you really count on people wanting the product and buying it, and will you have enough to pay the mortgage?
Kočner's monstrous world.
Where will Slovakia move the trial of the killers of journalist Kuciak?
In Slovakia, the main hearing in the trial of the four people accused of the murder of Ján Kuciak and Martina Kušnírová has begun.
The death of the investigative reporter and his partner has changed Slovakia.
It mobilised civil society, but also revealed the practices of the accused businessman Marián Kočner and his ties to the highest echelons of Slovak politics and justice.
How will the process be a turning point for Slovakia?
Journalists are to blame for this.
How is it possible that this petition got orders of magnitude more media attention than the counter-petition by the deans of all the medical faculties, which came out a day or two later?
No, they were taken in and the company got away with it.
People were dying of Covid on Czech television less than six months ago.
Another government ends and the law on the involvement of municipalities in the selection of a repository is nowhere to be found
Minister Karel Havlíček's draft needs a major overhaul
The government of Prime Minister Andrej Babiš is coming to an end, and the law that was supposed to ensure the respect of the interests of municipalities and their citizens in the selection and licensing of a deep repository for high-level radioactive waste still does not exist.
The legislative council of the government interrupted the debate on the draft, which the Ministry of Industry and Trade presented to the government after years of delays.
Its content is, however, in serious contradiction not only with the affected municipalities associated in the Platform against the Deep Repository, but also with the Union of Towns and Municipalities of the Czech Republic.
Self-governing bodies are expecting a significant strengthening of their ability to decide on a storage facility, which has been promised to mayors since 2011, when the first work on this legislation began, and which is demanded by the Czech atomic law as well as the European directive.
We expect the new government, in line with its coalition agreement, to revise the proposal in cooperation with the municipalities.
The draft bill from Minister Karl Havlíček, which the Platform has access to, is criticised by municipalities for the following: The proposed level of involvement of municipalities and the public in the decision-making process regarding the selection of a site for a repository is insufficient and cannot ensure respect for the interests of municipalities and their citizens.
It can only be truly effective if the municipalities or the public can influence whether the process is continued in a given location.
This can be achieved by placing a duty on the Storage Authority to obtain the approval of the affected municipalities before a specific procedure is initiated.
The proposed proposal for a regulation almost completely neglects the involvement of the public and makes the citizens of the municipalities practically mere statistics in the permitting procedures.
The proposal is missing the systematic setting of compensations for municipalities for the entire process of finding and selecting a site for a repository, its permitting and operation.
According to today's laws, representatives of municipalities do not have many options to defend the interests of their citizens when looking for a site for a storage facility.
Only in some permit proceedings can they submit comments or appeal, but the authority or the minister in whose interest the permit is issued makes the decision.
A potential lawsuit will not have a suspensive effect on the implementation of survey or construction works.
The co-determination of local authorities, which the Platform is asking for, is a common principle used in many democratically advanced countries, and certainly in those which have already progressed in allowing storage, such as Sweden and Finland.
The preparation of the law is another failure of the state administration, which hires external law firms to prepare the legislation.
In this case, it is a contract with the law firm HAVEL & PARTNERS s.r.o., which was concluded by SÚRAO, following contracts with lawyer Jan Zemánek.
According to the register of contracts, the total sum for this work is almost 4 million Czech crowns.
Antonín Seknička, deputy mayor of the village of Cejle in the Hrádek area and spokesperson for the Platform Against the Deep Repository, said: After the ministers of industry who only passed on the task of finding a deep repository for high-level radioactive waste to their successors, we expect a more decisive turn from the new government.
We also offer a helping hand.
We would also like to thank the Association of Towns and Municipalities, which views the problem of inadequate rights of municipalities in relation to such an important construction in the same way as the directly affected municipalities in selected locations.
The platform against the deep repository unites 51 members (35 municipalities and towns and 16 associations) in order to promote a change in the state's approach to handling spent nuclear fuel and other radioactive waste, which will not be limited to the deep repository.
The platform also proposes that the decision to select a site for possible storage should be subject to the prior consent of the affected municipalities.
John Goodman (69) was scared into losing weight: He lost 90 kg.
Although he had no need to change his lifestyle for many years, in the end it was the doctors who scared him.
He was told if he didn't lose weight, he would die.
And that took time.
Goodman has lost 90 kilograms, which is half of his original weight of 180 kilograms, The Sun reports.
He boasted of his new figure in Los Angeles at the premiere of the animated series The Freak Brothers.
The fat guy from the Roseanne sitcom is a completely different person!
John liked to joke that his friends and family had begged him to lose weight because his large body was causing furniture to break.
"I was putting everything in my mouth," the actor said in a 2018 interview with AARP.
This time, I wanted to do it slowly.
Move, exercise.
I'm getting to the age where I can't afford to sit still, Mr. Goodman, whose transformation is remarkable, told ABC.
It also depends on what kind of boss and in what context you want to use the word "boss".
If it's some kind of text on a platform that expects readers from the gaming environment, I wouldn't translate it at all.
If it was, for example, a formal text and a university one, I would probably be looking for a way to describe or explain the boss.
To make matters worse, there are different kinds of bosses.
A game like Dark Souls, for example, has multiple bosses, right, and so a "boss" is kind of like the lord/ruler of a level, and then there's a final boss...
Many games feature hidden bosses (super boss, hidden boss), which are not required to be defeated in order to complete the game or level, but are often stronger than standard bosses.
Then there are games like Half-Life, where the bosses are there, but the player doesn't directly fight them (Tentacle, Gargantua), and can they be called bosses at all?
And then there are the mini-bosses.
It's not really possible to translate boss into one word in general, Czech and other languages don't solve it either (Catalan is interesting, for example, which translates boss as the final opponent).
It is, in short, a computer-controlled opponent significant to the story or the game in general, more powerful than all previous ones and guarding the completion of some level or task.
The whole world is searching for London's missing Petra.
The Czech police were also involved.
British police have been looking for missing Petra Srncová since December 3.
The Czech police were also involved in the search.
The 32-year-old woman from the Uherské Hradiště region has been missing since December 7.
Interpol is also helping the British police.
Colleagues last saw Czech national Petra Srncová on November 28.
British police have been looking for her since 3rd December.
Interpol issued a so-called yellow notice for her.
So the whole world is looking for Peter.
"The Czech police cooperate closely with the British police," confirmed police spokeswoman Kateřina Rendlová.
"We're sharing information on the case," she added.
The announced search for Petra has already appeared on the police website.
She is described as being 168 centimetres tall, thin, with brown eyes and long, straight brown hair.
It should come from Uherské Hradiště.
Petra worked as a nurse in one of London's hospitals.
Her friends and colleagues are worried about her because this kind of disappearance is very unusual for her
The local MP, Harriet Harman, was also involved in the search for Peter.
She was involved in putting up flyers with Petra's face on them.
"We are deeply concerned about her," she said at a press conference on Saturday.
In connection with the disappearance, the British police have arrested one suspect.
However, it is not clear who it is and what they had in common with Petra.
Before Christmas, the Czech Republic is being terrorised by Agent Tesla.
While October data showed a slight decline in offensive campaigns, last month saw a significant uptick in attacks as the year drew to a close.
We recorded a large Agent Tesla campaign on November 18.
The attacks are specifically aimed at the Czech Republic.
The strategy of the attackers remains the same for now.
The infected attachment in the email is designed to attract the user's attention with a name that refers to payments and financial transactions.
While last month the dangerous attachment had the word "invoice" in its name, this time it was marked as "Copy of an invoice for 11.2021...exe," said Martin Jirkal from Eset.
The spyware scans internet browsers and other programs, such as Microsoft Outlook, Mozilla Thunderbird and Yandex e-mail clients.
The malicious code actively looks for stored login credentials, which it then sends to the attackers.
The last major campaign in the Czech Republic took place at the end of August and beginning of September, and as the holidays and the end of the year approach, the activity of the attackers is growing again.
In November, the spyware Formbook remained active.
In contrast to Agent Tesla, the attackers in this case are not specifically targeting the Czech Republic, and in November security specialists detected campaigns with a global reach.
Compared to Formbook's October data, it has weakened slightly in November, but still accounts for nearly a fifth of all detections.
The attacks occurred continuously throughout the month with increased activity on the 3rd, 10th, and 15th of November.
The Formbook most often contained an attachment with the .exe extension named REQUEST FOR SPECIFICATION.
However, the word 'receipt' continues to be used.
The attachment in Czech is then far more dangerous for the Czech user.
A significant decline and dampening of activity has been observed by security analysts in the Fareit program, which was responsible for 1.6 percent of attacks and has not had a major offensive campaign in the Czech Republic for several months.
Today's smart-alecks who don't need oxygen because oxygen is for vaccinated idiots.
The march through Prague was bigger than the media reported.
According to the footage of the march along the embankment and according to my experience as a demonstrator, I would estimate the number of people at around 10,000.
People in the parade filled the riverbank and the bridge and the opposite riverbank.
This means that there are really a lot of people.
The march of about 4,000 demonstrators is spontaneously joined by an unprecedented number of passers-by.
I claim that something new is being born here, writes Radek Mokrý.
That persistent discontent among several large groups or layers of the population led to them finding a common language.
The anti-vaxxers, anti-maskers and the like would not be able to fill or pay for such a large parade.
The events of the Chcípl pes association have increasing popularity, it reminds me of Million Moments for Democracy.
Sometimes I have the impression that they rent the same stage and equipment.
It's hard to say what kind of movement could arise from this dissatisfaction, it depends not only on the influx of money, but also on whether the three-dose Pfizer vaccine doesn't become four or more doses.
It will certainly not be a left-wing or centrist movement, you can bet on that.
The three-dose vaccine is almost certainly going to become a multi-dose one, as it is clear that we are going to have to be re-vaccinated every six months or so.
I'm very glad that the vaccines have saved us.
A great action by scientists, which the human race has a right to be proud of.
End of an era as Bulgaria gets new PM promising change
Bulgarian President Rumen Radev tasked Kiril Petkov of the anti-corruption movement We Continue the Change, which won the November elections, to form a new government.
Tom has managed to put together a broad-based coalition government that should take office in a few days.
The political crisis in the country has been going on since April, when the former government lost elections under the weight of anti-corruption protests.
The winning parties, which claimed to be fighting corruption and abuse of power, failed to reach an agreement, so two more early elections followed.
What do cats do when no one is watching?
It is a global hit.
Concerns have been growing in the UK about the fate of a 32-year-old Czech woman, who has been missing in London for several days.
Petra Srncová was last seen two weeks ago on her way home from work to the south of the British capital.
In addition to the police, her previous employer and the MP who represents part of London where she lived are also calling for information about the children's hospital worker.
"Petra's disappearance is completely out of character and we are growing increasingly concerned for her welfare," said Lucy O'Connor of the Lambeth police station where Ms. Srncova worked.
"Her family in the Czech Republic is also very worried and just wants to know where she is," she continued.
According to her, the missing Czech woman left work around 7:45 p.m. on Sunday 28 November and headed home to Camberwell.
She was last seen getting on a bus about half an hour later.
Her disappearance was reported on December 3 by one of her colleagues.
According to British media, the deer worked as an "assistant nurse" at the Evelina London Children's Hospital, which is part of Guy's and St Thomas' NHS Foundation Trust.
"We are deeply concerned about our dear colleague Petra who is missing," the health facilities group said in a Twitter post.
"We are appealing for anyone who may have any information which could assist in finding her to contact police," the statement continued.
Zdenka Dvořáková Kocourková, an amateur children's room painter from Šumperk (and also a regional pirate councillor) was reported to the police by an anonymous person for infringing copyright with her murals.
However, the court recognised that Krteček's paintings in the rooms in Šumperk do not violate the law.
In Ústí nad Labem, there was a month-long hole in the road, in the form of a channel without a cover.
It was a matter of life and death.
The council referred complaints to ŘSD, which owns the road, and when it allegedly failed to react, the hole continued to grow.
It took some time for the authorities to sort out responsibility and ownership, and after a month, ŘSD started to "deal intensively with the situation".
